She’ll never be there to grin at me and dance as we neck a little bit of E.
Poor me.
We got up that morning and headed out for the race.
I know Archie comics became "born again" at some point in their history, but this ain't it - the rest of the issue is completely "normal". The Josie issues before and after this issue were free from overt religious messages.... so, I don't know what the f--k is going on here.
Do you love these fabrics and sofas? Would you use them to decorate your home?
Has his body been taken by the sea?
Agents for peace are bringing an end to the devastating conflict between the roaming Traction Cities and their fanatical enemies whilst Wren and her father Tom travel the Bird Roads in their airship, trying to forget that Hester has betrayed them. In the ruined wreckage of the city of London they make a discovery that will change the world, and Hester must face an implacable foe with the means and will to destroy the entire human race. The final instalment of Reeve’s award-winning quartet reaches a thrilling conclusion.
In Revelation, plus Ezekiel and Daniel and Isaiah, the author writes “and I was in the Spirit and I saw…” what I would say is “and I was in the Spirit and I couldn’t think, speak, move, or do anything” The first part of that sentence is already too much for me to handle. John was in the Spirit. In the Spirit. And then he saw GOD’S THRONE ROOM.
completion or until such time as the building is sold. The applicant further agrees to submit a picture
We went into half-time leading 3-1, with goals from our younger contingent of twenty-one year olds, Chris Pye and Ryan Hurst, and twenty-year old Ali Ingram. There was further room for refereeing analysis in the second-half, when Chris Pye had a goal disallowed for offside. Chris was extremely cheesed off. Having already accepted the congratulations of his team mates, and back in his own half for the re-start, he could only assume he'd made the score 6-2. Comrades' linesman had other ideas. Dressed in deck shoes, jeans, shirt and a grey Ralph Lauren tank top – naturally, he was quite adamant that the goal was offside, leaving his flag raised until the referee saw it. A long discussion between the referee and linesman followed, presumably one about a brand new ruling meaning two men and a goalkeeper between you and the goal can play you offside. If the assessor really was on the FIFA hotline, this was surely the perfect opportunity to check the rule book and pull rank. He didn't. The disallowed goal had no bearing on the outcome of the game either. Chris Pye later hit the post, then Ryan Hurst, up from a corner, came within whiskers of completing his hat-trick. This is our first league win of the season, and having now scored ten goals in the previous two games, we look to have found some momentum.
A red lipsticked kiss on the cheek to both gentlemen.
No gift is complete without a tag:
We have the opportunity and the power to shape in our favor.
I recently sat down with Christina (okay, so there might have been sitting on both ends, but we weren't actually sitting next to each other--oh, the joys of the internet) and asked her a few questions.
-Combine the black beans, sweet potato, and oil in a food processor. Pulse until all items are well combined - you will need to stop it and scrape down the sides a few times. Should be a creamy mixture.
Civilization depends in large part upon men curbing their instincts. Restraint, self-discipline, filtering, gratification denial; call it what you like, it's all about out-thinking the first reaction.
As for the KPMG document, “they said there are confidentiality issues. I have agreed to listen to their claims.”
“It’s the taxpayers’ money,” Councillor Ford said. “It’s not our money. We should give it back to the people that gave it to us.”
Lightly spoon flour into a dry measuring cup; level with a knife. Place flour, 1/2 teaspoon salt, and black pepper in a large saucepan. Gradually add milk, stirring with a whisk. Cook over medium heat until slightly thick (about 12 minutes), stirring constantly. Remove from heat. Combine 1 cup milk mixture and poblanos in a blender; process until smooth. Stir pureed poblano mixture into remaining milk mixture.
Her femininity comes undone in the yellow-red swirl
The little brown beetle looked up at the bright green and gold parrot, at the green and gold palm trees above their heads, at the green mangoes with golden flushes on their cheeks lying on the ground under the mango trees, at the golden sunshine upon the distant green hills. "I choose a coat of green and gold," she said.
One other point I appreciate is that Eastwood acts his age. He is not the sixty year old Rocky Balboa stepping back into the ring with a guy thirty years his junior and coming out in one piece. Horrigan is grizzled, tired, and well passed retirement age. He can barely keep and even gets beaten up by Leary in the climax. But that is an aspect that kicks the film up a notch. Hoorigan’s need for redemption keeps him going against all odds. Leary know it, too. The story becomes as much about him keeping Horrigan down as it is about successfully killing the president.
Being farther from the sun than Terra, Barsoom cooled faster and was suitable for supporting life much sooner. Being smaller, it has only about 1/3 the gravitational pull of Terra. Lesser gravity allows for more possibilities in terms of overall size, rate of growth, and rate of variation in speciation. Concomitant with lesser size/mass, there is less ability to hold an atmosphere, which was thinner to begin with because of the size factor. A thinner atmosphere is less effective than a thicker one for blocking radiation of all kinds. Radiation contributes to a higher rate of mutation. Evolution proceeds faster than it would on a planet with a thicker atmosphere. Throw in the extra environmental stresses associated with the constant bombardment because of its proximity to the asteroid belt and you have a recipe for early, rapid evolution.
The Old House was probably built for a local gentleman, William Parker, who died in 1699 – a Parker coat of arms forms part of the decoration. Whoever designed it lavished much care on it – details such as the curvy little pediment and the carefully formed window surrounds show a painstaking hand. And the fact that the house was built in 1678 is interesting too – as the listing text for the building points out, this is quite early for this kind of classical house in the Midlands – most such houses in Leicestershire date from the 18th century. The designer must have had an eye on more advanced architectural fashions in southeast England, where houses like this were more common.
(Greed) may apply to the need to feel more excessively moral, social or otherwise better than someone else.
There were two certain days of my life, even the terrified etching pen of mine will never forget. Sunday, June 12, 2011 marked an interesting day in the history of Nigerian entertainment industry while I still rep Nigerian Entertainment Today (NET Newspaper) as a hard-to-push-over journalist. It was both that super talented kid, Ayodeji Ibrahim Balogun (a.k.a Wizkid)’s Superstar Album Launch at the Expo Hall of Eko Hotel & Suites and the awesome event of that def Disc Jockey, Jimmy Adewale Amu (a.k.a DJ Jimmy Jatt), the Jump OFF at the Get Arena both on Victoria Island.
after all Obama won!
…if you confess with your mouth that Jesus is Lord and believe in your heart that God raised him from the dead, you will be saved.
Most kids have NORMAL hobbies as they're growing up. You know, like baseball or stamp collecting. Bryce's hobby? Cherry bombs. Yeah.
Mother's Birth Place:
Hermann Goering, attributed by Gustave Gilbert
analects ns.pl; collected literary fragments. What I have in my 'bottom drawer' of assorted book ideas, just-started novels, and related items.
Other than Shakeology, I've just been trying to eat sensibly. Nothing hard there. Moving and the stress of life can be daunting and exhausting, but that doesn't mean you should compromise your healthy habits.
and i ain't dead yet...there's still a lot of play left in this aging southern california hippie/georgia dixie chick!
Capital Cellars is unusual in that it is a retail wine and spirits shop with a bar and restaurant, all in the same space. They have pleasant outdoor seating on Broadway, a terrific bourbon selection, and special expertise in the growing number of Kentucky-made wines. It's a very comfortable and relaxed place. I saw one woman cheerfully enjoying her white wine on the rocks.
fold the inner side edge of piece5&6 pocket once and sew it onto the body.
Finally, Björk struck out for solo stardom. She had already made forays outside The Sugarcubes, hooking up with 808 State for two songs, 'Ooops' and 'Qmart', on 1991's Ex:El. "Just out of hunger for good stuff, I'd started going to clubs when I was in the UK, 'cos the rock gigs were just crap," she recalls. "Very quickly I fell for 808 State, 'cos they were more rhythmically complex." Another UK techno outfit she liked was bleep'n'bass pioneers LFO, whose Mark Bell would later collaborate with her on Homogenic.
Conscience: 9/10, Altruism: 10/10, Wisdom: 9/10, Courage: 10/10, Determination: 10/10.
Rural Subdivision Lots/Tracts - The total number of acreage lots sold in the 2nd quarter of 2009 declined 39.1% (23 in '08 vs. 14 in '09). The average price of a sold acreage lot declined 35.3% ($129,405 in '08 vs. $83,761 in '09) and the average DOM increased by 50%. The total dollar volume of acreage lots sold decreased 60.60%. Notably, the average LP/SP ratio has decreased by 3.05%.
Whilst you’re crying rivers
2-3 cups diced, cooked chicken
This was nice but I am definitely ready for Cusco. See you there!
William and Kate at the altar are shocked and horrified at this spectacle. But the naked minister reaches for his Bible to show them that Isaiah walked naked and so can he. He has no idea that God commanded his prophet do walk naked for a purpose concerning the message God had to give to a sinful people Israel. He clipped out a few scriptures out of their context and applied it to himself. The reason? Complete Bible ignorance on his part.
Bush and Bowie all in the same breath.
Check it out! That is Canada (White Rock, British Columbia to be exact) sitting out there across the water. Had an appointment near the border today.
Hmmmm, shrimp flavored coffee....
egg replacer equal to one egg
“It is possible to have a much more tangible relationship with who is growing our food and changes inevitably ripple outward to our local community and ultimately impact globally,” said Ms. Reinke
The emergence in our age of a new Third World, not only Afro-Asian but Latin American and Middle Eastern, was no mere geographic designation, as massive and substantive as that was. Rather, Third World became synonymous both with new forces of revolution and with those new forces as Reason. These new revolutionary forces–peasants as well as proletarians, Women’s Liberationists as well as youth anti-war activists–saw in that most exciting color, Black, so deep a revolutionary dimension and so intense an internationalism imbedded in their national liberation struggles that, far from being a “Third” World, it encompassed the whole world….
On this card I spy some punches: Word Window, Modern Label, and Bird Builder. I spy some dies: Thin Cuts: Flowers, Sizzix: Embosslit: Flower Burst. And I spy embellishments: vellum metal rim tag and a brad. The cute sentiment is from Paper Smooches, the Word Salad collection.
We had had a lot to celebrate: the Chocolate High Holiday, Anzac Day, and CB's birthday.
The CCTV cameras that captured the entire assault are situated in Johan van Dalen’s yard. Van Dalen says, "We do not want to go to the police station and show them the footage because we are scared they will lock us up to cover this up." The NEWS contacted the spokesman of the Krugersdorp Police, Captain Jacob Raboroko for comment who said that he would send through comment as soon as possible.
During the Enlightenment this idea of utopia went from abstract poetics to boardroom pie-charts.
Now that we have played the economical reasoning game for a while, we might find ourselves beaten, to the point that there are no common area for the three… we might be wrong..
Hope you like it! Have a fabulous day!
Every year as Mother’s Day approaches, Buster and the girls start asking me over and over what I want for Mother’s Day.
And, sitting there on the edge of the bandit camp in West Karana, if I had said, “Role Playing,” my daughter probably would have felt she understood and let it be. Instead, I said “camping.”
within the visions of my nightmare scene
Alice stared up at her in amazement. “But what about you?” She asked. “And your illness?”
Catholic school vs. public school, anyone? Oh, the sensory details that distinguish each of those settings.
The inaugural Els for Autism Golf Challenge in 2011 raised $1.8 million through direct support from nearly 9,000 donors and major corporate sponsors, with more than 1,700 amateurs competing. The 2012 format will remain the same, with two-person amateur teams competing in 30 best-ball format Super Regional events across the U.S. at the PGA Tour’s TPC clubs and other outstanding golf properties this spring and summer.
To explore the uniqueness I offer them
First off I would like to apologize for my diminishing volume of posts lately. I've been trying to arrange my garage for the improved brewery equipment I'm attempting to implement. If you've ever been to my garage you know this is no simple task. Shelves are being erected (giggity) and junk is hitting the curb. I'll update you and give you some step by step as far as some of the brewing equipment is concerned as soon as I get some free time.
Because we belong to you
The recipe will make about 6 big bowls of soup. I will post that recipe when I make my soup next time! Hope you enjoyed this quick how-to!
4 ounces golden caster sugar (1/2 cup)
Pieces are neat, stream lined, structured and sharp to the eye. Flashes of bold colour, most popularly bright berry shades, are blended down with neutrals.
‘This is the true essence of anarchism: To become a human being, yes, but a politician, never.’
A week ago I had to rebuild the hard drive of my Mac. This was pretty momentous because it’s only the second time since I first bought a Mac that I’ve had to do it, not counting OS upgrades. The first time I did it just for fun.
Break Season 2011’. It’s hard to forget the Thai Charles Bronson.
Emboldened by the 2008 (D) sweep led by the as-yet-unrevealed Obama (who is not a Muslim), the (D) party rammed Obamacare down America’s throat in the dead of night with very few witnesses on the floor of Congress, and then signed it into law in a tiny White House ceremony. That bold but covert move sparked the TEA Party and the voter revolt that led to a (D) rout in 2010.
Fluff
John 8:58 should help clear up any confusion: “Jesus said to them, Truly, truly, I say to you, Before Abraham was, I am.” That “I am” on the last is YHWH in Hebrew; it was the name God adopted for Himself, and here Jesus is using a clever turn of phrase to claim that it is His own name, and that He eternally exists (He had no beginning). So, no, it is not correct to say that Jesus isn’t YHWH, especially when Jesus Himself claimed to be so.
EOH: There’s nothing in the 80 page report that shows that you or your husband received any financial benefit from this meeting.
“Shut the fuck up you fucking…fuck.”
Slip stitch in previous slip stitch of main body, joining both pieces securely.
The work of bringing down heaven to earth is no easy task. And it always takes time…and a lot of it. This is the epic work of pilgrimages and journeys, deserts and dreams. There is always such fanfare and exhilaration when one picks up the walking stick and marks, and crosses into, the beginning of the journey. The vision of the destination is so clear, so lucid–it seems you could just reach across a short breadth of time and realize every desired detail. But soon you find your arm is tired from being extended for so long…for so very long. Your hand clutches that walking stick with a deepened sense of understanding that this stick is with you to uphold and offer stability when the road gets longer, instead of shorter. For sacred destinations always require time and long processes; the meaningful meanderings are necessary to bring you to that place where you are able to see and hear with a clarity that simply doesn’t exist at the beginning.
The actual people at the dolphin discovery centre were great and so helpful. At the dolphin discovery centre you experience swimming with the dolphins in the wild, if you can swim you can go out on the boat and get in the water with the dolphins, as Danielle is unable to swim we just held her with us in the water and on some occasions a pod of 20 to 30 dolphins would swim around and under us, Danielle would be calm but smiling each time we went out and when we arrived back she would laugh and giggle. Other days if people cannot swim the beach is also a place where the dolphins come to visit and you can walk out to waist depth and they come in and swim around you. This was actually just as amazing! One day they came up and touched Danielle’s leg and then just stayed a while looking at her. Another day they came swam around us and the hovered in front of Danielle looking at her and you could actually feel the sonar pulses they send out, some say they do this to heal, but others don't believe in that.
That's it, Easy Peasy Lemon Squeezy!
I can say that this is not a clone, but it appears that Mr. Fulford is still in a state of trauma from his three months of imprisonment off the coast of Monaco, daily torture by Rothschild’s henchmen, and nightmarish sexual abuse by reptilian rapists. Noted European psychotherapists are going to examine Fulford and see if the Cabal used the physical pain and vile sex to split his psyche and create alters a la MKUltra.
Be you for you.
The LORD makes is presence known with thunder and lightning and a thick cloud covering the top of the mountain. What, very naturally, is the immediate response of the people? (“Everyone in the camp trembled.” (Exodus 19:16 NIV))
Asha wore a pink dress and wanted a pink bow in her hair. Her teacher, Ms. Chrissy, was so warm and welcomed all of the kids in the room with hugs and/or hand shakes.
"There are people who say that bird flu has been around for 16, 17 years and never attained human transmissibility and never will," said Malik Peiris, virology professor at the University of Hong Kong.
If you want to see the film, I recommend it. It stays pretty true to the novel, but does take some creative license in interpreting scenes and adding scenes that I’m not sure were part of the novel. The film is dark, which seems to be an artistic attempt to portray a mood, but I didn’t see this darkness as an accurate feature of the novel. The ending of the film is also more subtle than the novel and leaves more for the viewer to decide. I still liked it, however.
Jack: "I think I heard it on the news, Massachusetts was number 8."
Drop by to one of our online stores to checked out some wonderful ideas for the perfect way to dress up your outfit.
Prevention of laryngitis is the same as for any upper respiratory infection. People should wash their hands frequently and thoroughly, and should avoid contact with people who might be sick. However, even with relatively good hygiene practices, most people will get about five to six colds per year. It is unpredictable which of these may lead to laryngitis.
With the festive season approaching there are craft fairs on the horizon. Following a discussion at the recent UK Handmade Surrey meet-up I have been doing some online research on display or "Visual Merchandising" for crafts and fairs, I found these articles quite interesting and Im going to use some of the advice in my new displays -
The coldness of winter clawed beneath Alex’s skin as he gulped a deep breath. The ash rested solidly against his palm, comforting. Solemnly, he whispered, “I will always wait for you.”
I just loved the October Afternoon Paper so I used that as a focal point in the project. I had an antique Egg Saver envelope and a doily that I added to the outside of the paper bag pocket. For the inside, I added a card to let someone know how happy they make me. Here's a close up of the card:
"Come on".
Characters: Gumpaste
12-01 Berlin, Germany – Arena Treptow
Do you run through each day
The darkness on the Planet at that time was so dark that he could not complete his mission and ascended with his physical Body in 1708 A.D. Before leaving the Planet he asked permission from the Divine power to leave the Planet.
I write about being a good dad, I talk about being a good dad, and I speak at conferences about being a good dad. And sometimes, I'm just not that good. Why should anyone listen to what I have to say if I'm not walking the talk?
And autism affects about 6 percent of all special-education students, up from 2 percent over the past decade.
It shouldn’t matter if a 19 year old GIRL gamer who’s paralyzed in a wheelchair can headshot you in Halo Reach 3 times before you even change your clip out – but apparently it’s heinous in the eyes of bigot gamers who feel that the anonymity of online gameplay gives them the right to say horribly outlandish things. I find these actions appalling and that’s why I’m so admiring of 8-Bit Animal for his inspiring message.
Or, taken food & blankets to the homeless man that sleeps at the blockbuster.
Indian Alcohol and Substance Abuse Prevention Program - Prevent and reduce alcohol and substance abuse-related crimes
For me social justice means more happiness for all, more fun for all, the chance for everyone to fulfil their potential. So I try to make people roar with laughter as well as seethe with anger. And, yes, some of my stuff is very rude.
“Our focus is to showcase the best of Indian cinema to the world. With the unparalleled success of IIFA Singapore in 2004, we are back here to relive the magic,” Sabbas Joseph, director, Wizcraft International Entertainment, said in a statement.
smiled along, as they made fun of their imperfections,
2010 Cerium (11th); 2011 Becauseicouldntsee (Fell 2nd)
I've had loads of excuses to take on:
So we start with the word itself.
I will not hide behind the camera
Nothing muffles or stills the sound
And now Id like to get back to this weeks Challenge and as always we are being sponsered by the very generous and talented Veronica and Pedro of The Paper Shelter and they are offering you a prize of
* 2 tsp black pepper
4) Meeting one on one with a new Christian to talk over some basic stuff.
Of course, there are many liberal blogs with substantial blogrolls. Shakespeare's Sister and MyLeft Wing, for example, have very extensive blogrolls. Mike Finn at Crooks & Liars often links to smaller sites. I am sure there are many others. And there are many that have even seen fit to include a reasonable conservative like myself among their ranks. But I think the blogosphere would be better served if everyone's blogrolls were bigger and more inclusive. Bloggers often complain of the elitism of the mainstream press so it seems odd that so many blogrolls should be cordoned off with velvet ropes.
Apologies for the lack of posting the last few days, no doubt I will leave large gaps over the festive period. Tomorrow post will be a rant about half of our population, so no doubt that will rattle a few feathers!
A friend says, “I’m sick.” Take the hands of that person. “We will pray now!
The other consideration was family. Although at that time not much was being said to one another, I still thought it would be a mistake to just abandon them. Looking back, the position of a steering wheel was more important. These days, it would definately be the other way around. Meaning I’d put family first. Then the steering wheel.
This is what we had for dinner tonight and it was sensational if I do say so myself! I’ve come to the conclusion that the best way to ensure you get the delicious caramalisation at the end is to watch it for the last 10 or so minutes, or as we did tonight get everyone around the table – dished up the kids serves – then put it back on the heat to reduce the liquid to almost nothing.
Keep DVDs, CDs, and jewellry off of the dressers. Keep one or two books on each bed stand and put the others away in a book shelf.
(A note on the respondents who sold their first books without an agent: Given the reluctance of the larger houses to deal with unagented authors, the fact that nearly half the respondents had no agent surprises me. However, many respondents appear to have been children's picture book writers, which is one of the markets in which it's more feasible to go agentless, even with the bigger publishers. Also, the numbers may be skewed by when the writers sold their books--before the 1990's, the big houses were still relatively open to unagented writers--or to whom, since smaller publishers are more likely to be willing to work directly with authors.)
AdriN2001: I know him, my friend James
"As bloggers of color, we are such a smaller number of people than our white counterparts. That makes reaching the volume of traffic much harder, and the lack of social and financial capital also makes this harder," Rabb said.
But now I have a blog, and like… one reader.
. CD Cover (2x front, 1x back)
I slept in ripped tights; I do not remember that happening before.
Here is one of many:
2) $1000 for registration, travel to attend the Annual STLHE Conference
Structured Learning Exercises/Team Building Activities
This is why I have decided to take this course of action.
3 cups sugar
After pregnancy I felt remarkably good after the restricted alcohol intake so haven’t thought about a detox in a while. Recently though, a glass of wine (or two) around dinner time has become a habit that I would like to break. Add that too a busy month or two of events, where I still mindlessly reach for any food that passes my way (despite my commitment to healthy living), and I need to reset my system.
That is correct! If you listen to this podcast we provide you with details on how to enter and how you can possibly win this awesome prize!
And one of the items IHeart very much for office spaces, is a file tote! Why IHeart them? They are super easy to carry anywhere you want to do your bills and filing. On the go storage rocks!
In contrast, the Greek word for load means “cargo,” or “the burden of daily toil.” This word describes the everyday things we all need to do. These loads are like knapsacks. Knapsacks are possible to carry. We are expected to carry our own. We are expected to deal with our feelings, attitudes, and behaviours, as well as the responsibilities God has given to each one of us, even though it takes effort.
I began to think of all this tree had seen, felt, and heard in the hundreds of years it had been standing in this one spot. If only this tree really could speak to me. What would it tell me? Here this tree stood tall and majestic providing beauty and shelter for anyone who came near. It asked for nothing in return. It was a giving tree. And then I thought of the carvings and what that did to this tree. Who made the first carving? Was it a hundred years ago or longer? The people who carved their initials in this tree have most likely left this earth by now yet, the imprint they left on the tree is still there. They’ve passed on to another place while the tree continues to weep from the carving they left. Then I wondered what all had this tree seen through the years. Were their wars going on all around it? People fighting? Arguing? Were their peaceful times? I’m sure when the tree saw all of the people who were in love, its soul smiled.
We are all familiar with, although sometimes frustrated by, the software on our computers. We have a vague understanding of the software that’s running in our brain. Once the reality dawned to those on the Titanic, they had to use their heads. Some survived, some dived in the water, some went down with the ship. Running a business today feels a bit like that. The watertight doors are locked down – so are the banks. The passengers are in disarray – so are our customers. We look to the captain and his crew – politicians and government – for solutions. We are where we are. But where will we be next year?
A Holistic Redemption – Gen 1.26-31
Fortunately, my good friends over at Pool Vodka(follow them on twitter @PoolVodka) hit me up and asked me to do a review of their product. I jumped at the opportunity and was not disappointed!! Pool Vodka is Great!!!
and Stamping Dragon Designs is still running the Grab Bag promotion
I know it sounds complex, and I assure you that it is. But it’s such wonderful reading! If anything, I find myself more drawn towards these little framing stories than to the story of the war itself. One particular section, the one that talks about the origin of snakes and how they’ve come to acquire the evil reputation they possess is alone worth the price of the book, in my opinion.
Some of these things are literally priceless. (I know, I know – but I meant that sincerely, not as a joke.) For instance, Marshall’s typescript of his thesis on Nashe, with his corrections, and two copies made when they first got a Xerox at the Centre for Culture and Technology, his little now-decrepit space at the University of Toronto. This is what my father Eric used to make the manuscript which would become The Classical Trivium: The Place of Thomas Nashe in the Learning of His Time (Ginko Press, 2006). The Ginko edition doesn’t give him any credit for that though – similarly, many people don’t know that my father wrote most of Culture is Our Business (and I’m not sure he would appreciate me pointing this out, but hey). It is also worth pointing out that Eric tried to get the Nashe thesis published for many years – decades, really – before Ginko finally did it.
-.Malta 1
and to nurture them
It's Saturday morning and I'm sat in bed with a cup of coffee, reading my Kindle, Hubby has gone to work and Paige is still asleep, it's all very quiet and peaceful with just the birds singing, bliss !!!!
He wasn’t a fisherman by the actual meaning of the word. He had taken up throwing his net in the Yamuna to get food for herself, when he was beaten by the world to expect nothing better. But after this incident, he swore to try and find his way in the world, horrified lest he too should turn up like that.
Ever wondered why they were there?
Special Effects: (5/10) – This is another issue with Lockout. The low budget makes all of the more ambitious effects-driven scenes, including a motorcycle chase that kicks off the movie and an element of the climax involving dropping through outer space, feel cheap and all TOO cheesy. Much of these effects are so blatantly green-screened in that they just look really fake and unimmersive for the audience. Lockout thankfully shirks special effects most of the time, focusing on practical set work and action, which is really for the best considering its paltry budget, but when it DOES have to involve effects, it really creates a disconnect between the green screening and the rest of the movie, and it takes you out of the film.
An article in the rightwing Israeli Jerusalem Post agrees. “Support for settlement is not simply a program of right-of-center Likud. Its history has firm roots in Labor party activity during the periods of its governments, and activities by predecessors of the Labor party going back before the creation of the Israeli state” (April 27).
Monday: Ernie Massey's Italian Chicken (new recipe)
Hello my bloggers,
Right, my reason for all of this ranting: This is a specific and hopefully isolated event but I doubt it very much. I’m sure I could search the local news up and down the UK and find more examples (if you know of any let me know in a comment). Woking Borough Council have decided that they are going to spend (up to) £27k on commemorative mugs to celebrate the Queens 60 years on the throne and give them away free to kids in local schools as mementos. Most kids I know would find this the coolest thing on the planet, a mug with the Queens face on it. I bet they’ll all be walking around with them on show, like gang bling, for years to come!
We've made it every year but last year (family circumstances) but if we can make it this year we will be there.
You can learn the basics of defending traditional marriage from this column. But same-sex marriage is actually less of a threat to marriage than another policy called “no-fault divorce”. Let’s look at that policy.
What can ya do?
I taught the girls to play as soon as they could spell and we have a beautiful pink board.
but i’ve learned that you are cheating yourself and others if you aren’t being simply straightforward and honest. honesty is the best policy, right? it’s just not fair to you or the people you serve. so, i swallowed my pride and laid myself out there, admitting where i was and that i simply didn’t have the strength to continue.
But….
Northern Arm: You will go approximately 2.2 circuitous miles from the trailhead to the northeastern tip of the peninsula. For the first mile or so, the trail stays close to the shoreline, offering nearly continuous winter views of the lake. At about the 1.15-mile mark the trail veers uphill away from the lake only to rejoin it about a half-mile later. The trail then repeats this out-and-back pattern again before rejoining the lake shortly before the 2-mile mark. Most, though not all, of the most technically challenging mountain biking sections are in this part of the trail. To your left, at the peninsula’s northeastern tip, you will see an old duck blind at the water’s edge.
Also brewed with: flaked oats, Belgian baker's chocolate, lactose sugar, vanilla beans, star anise & sweet orange peel
A contemporary of Jerome’s said that no man “ever became more completely a New Yorker.”
Princeton scholar Lester Brown, an early sounder of the alarm of global food shortages and higher prices, writes in Science Magazine “that the net impact of the food-to-fuel push will be an increase in global carbon emissions—and thus a catalyst for climate change.”
A regiment with this rule may shoot at an enemy regiment within the distance listed in brackets with the Rock Lobber special rule (eg, 40cm, 50cm, etc). The shooting regiment must have LOS to the target. If the target is in range and can be seen, roll the shooting regiment’s Fight die. If the result is 4+ the shot hits. Otherwise it’s a miss.
It’s been many years
A man who believes he is God's gift to women - and a man who remembers a woman was God's gift to man...
There are more layers than denotations and connotations. Such third layer content could be political, symbolical or even other types of contents.
Not an easy one to pull off but white Christmas decoration looks ethereal! Imagine Snow outside and white decorations inside :) Use just a little pop of color to make it even more elegant.
Boston (BOS), Burlington (BTV), Buffalo (BUF), Charlotte (CLT), Chicago (ORD), Fort Lauderdale (FLL), Jacksonville (JAX), Orlando (MCO), Portland Maine (PWM), Raleigh/Durham (RDU), Tampa (TPA) and Washington Dulles (IAD).
At least Aleister Crowley, arch sorcerer of black Magick (his special spelling) thought so. "The Beast 666" (his own appellation) says:
5. Your answer depends a lot on how you view the Bible.
Please make checks payable to “All & Everything Conferences” with the form below or a photocopy.
and thoughts and memories.
Of course this is assuming that you want to write on subjects which are international. There are of course subjects which are much easier to write from Israel than anywhere else.
On reflection however maybe the ideas of Scottish Independence and crop circles are related. Both satisfy our desire for escapism and fulfil that part of our nature occupied by dreams. Or perhaps more sinisterly, our nationalist politicians actually are little green men from space – ‘Uff’, the smell of nationalist politics.
Norma sat with her daughter as she had since the shooting. It was an accidental scheduling. She took the day time, Mark took the early mornings and because he’d yet to acclimate to the time difference, DJ took the night. Each day, she’d brought something to work on. The first day she’d been too nervous to do much but read and pray. The second day she’d written a letter and worked on embroidery. Today she was humming over her crocheting. Mark liked to watch television while he was with Meg. He’d keep a running dialogue over the sports channel just as they did when Meg was awake. Arriving just a few minutes earlier than they’d scheduled, Norma sent Mark home to spend time with the grand children while their sons slept and worked. The girls went shopping to buy food and, at Norma’s request, a hospital kit for Meg. Norma refused to believe that anything else but health would come to her daughter.
David: Five
Well, I'm finally off to read--for real. I graded a nice, hefty stack of papers this morning, so I am more than ready to read. Now, what should I read? I can't decide...
lest I would not now
So I went in to seeing the movie this evening with a little skepticism. Yeah, the movie has an 8.4 rating at IMDB, placing it in the top 100 movies of all times, is directed by the man who brought us Mission Impossible 3 and the always entertaining TV show Alias, and yeah, every review I have read says it is amazing, but then so went the hype about Batman Begins, and that, while good, didn't live up (despite an amazing score by my homeboy Hans Zimmer).
Yet despite daily dealings with apathetic students and useless administrators, Pete still thinks he might be able to save the world and impress Riley Merritt—social studies teacher and the only
Of course, he knew great motorcycle tuners like George Brown and Noel Pope but was anxious to take his own route. He gained an appointment to see Professor G F Mucklow, the Head of Mechanical Engineering at the University of Birmingham, and who had carried out a lot of research into supercharged single-cylinder engines. I was very excited when Grandad said he would take me along - I think he had an idea that it would inspire me to go to University. Grandad explained what he was trying to do, and Professor Mucklow listened carefully before smiling and saying, "You should really be talking to my former assistant, Doctor Shilling. She knows all about superchargers and fuelling - and motorcycles!" Grandad wasn't often stopped in his tracks. "Do you mean Tilly Shilling?" he said at last. "I raced against her at Brooklands!" And that was indeed who the Professor meant.
I want to share with you my VINTAGE HOME lifestyle...as it is.
That picture represents the future. It represents the summer I am going to get to spend with my sister, her daughter, and my son. It will be so fun. I think having children has really brought my sister and I closer. I love it!
Your Aspie score: 100 of 200
Rollover suspension is great news
Mme. Sarkozy, the definition of distinguished, the epitome of elegance, the icon of irreproachable class is having an extra craptastic week. A video has just surfaced. Not sex, silly rabbit, trix are for kids! Just pillow talk really, but enough to make even this classless hack choke on her PB&J.
Cadence
Not so long ago rosado wines were considered by many to be sweet, simple, silly wines for summertime picnics. In just the last few years this perception has shifted dramatically. At The Spanish Table we now stock rosado all year long, in a variety of styles from numerous regions in Spain and Portugal. They range in hue from pale coral to ripe watermelon and express a spectrum of aromas and flavors. They can be dry or fruity, floral or mineral, ripe or lean.
3. Sport results Page 301 delivered the latest sports scores and news as millions will remember fondly. Despite providing the scores of many different types of games, Ceefax was especially adored by cricket fans – as the quiet ticking over of the game suited the media.
Still working on balancing my hormones but it's not as bad as it used to be.
This time around on first taste the flavor was the familiar profile, bready and creamy smooth, but the finish seemed surprisingly bitter, not hops bitter, just bitter. As I progressed with my glass the bitterness remained and even arrived a little earlier in the profile. It was a much different beer then I had last time. I suspect the problem was my lunch which I had a couple of hours earlier, pork chops with a mango-tomato salsa. I’m thinking the beer picked up the acid left from the fruit and had an adverse reaction to it. Don’t get me wrong, even this way Triple XB wasn’t bad, but it wasn’t the same, so time to track down a third bottle.
For weeks I have not been shaving so I could participate in the Turkish practice of waxing.
Well, we’re normal now alright. My place amongst the smirkers and nodders has been assured. Alcoholic mother? My dad killed himself. I win.
(When we were watching a trashy tv show about young people going out and getting wasted...)
About a month ago the clock on our sideboard stopped. It's the old-fashioned kind, that needs winding once a week; we bought it in an antique shop in Otford, long before we came to live in the village. It felt like bringing it home when we finally moved here.
Several months ago someone put the idea into my head that I should make some quiet books. This is one project that I've never really had the desire to do, but that little seed kept growing until one day I found myself drawing up the templates and then at JoAnn's buying the supplies.
"Hello, Mr. C.!
This approach contains a lot of risks. Distractions, for one thing. I use the internet for research, and I don’t have to tell anyone reading this how easy it is to go from a news article to another news article and suddenly, you’ve spent an hour goofing about on YouTube watching kittens. If I work on my couch, there’s the TV. If he’s home, my boyfriend is quite distracting, in many happy fun ways that don’t get writing done.
That she will remember a Flushing without ghosts.
Now looking back, that was our last time holidaying with Hadi …. he was happy to be there but was reluctant to step out of the bungalow. There was one time, as I was carrying him, I purposely distracted him by talking in a soothing manner to him about this and that … and before he knew it, we were already at the pool area. He saw and said “Nak masuk dalam…”
His grin ignited a need in her that no career could satisfy.
People come to pray - because they're hurting for the loss of life, but there are others in our city that are hurt by our very presence. There's a lot of anger - sometimes because there's no room for an unpopular voice of dissent to the status quo, sometimes because so many have been wounded by abortion... some people are just angry. There is shame and guilt too - there is sometimes bitter resentment... fear, grief, hope...
Here is a quick look behind the scenes of D Powers latest Grime banger Horror Show which features Frisco,Chronik,Riko,Flowdan & G man with the Official Video set to be released soon.
That is the exceptional story of Hariprobha Basu Mallik, who married a Japanese entrepreneur Wemon Takeda, and travelled to Tokyo in 1912, and whose life has been recreated on the celluloid by eminent Bangladeshi director Tanvir Mokammel in his latest documentary, “Japani Bodhu” (The Japanese Wife) set to be premiered in Dhaka next month.
If the world naturally drifted upward like hot-air balloons, leaders and leadership would be irrelevant.
sharing food
Surrounded by my beloved friends and family, heavenly saints and angels, I am completely blessed. I’m so encouraged by everyone cheering me on with your comments and prayers. Thank you for sharing in this with me!!
There is no question that politics and entertainment are intertwined. Jack Valenti, who was the founder of the Motion Picture Association of America, has been quoted as saying “Washington and Hollywood spring from the same DNA” because its participants are always onstage and always performing. Consider these examples, most of them from just the past few months:
74. Pucho & The Latin Soul Brothers - Georgia On My Mind (3:56)
However. Taoism’s practice is interpreting, behaving(or not behaving), interacting, or patterning more and more with the way nature happens as it becomes more apparent to the person.
—that work is taken to Germany from a Member State of the European Union and de facto power of disposal thereof is transferred in Germany,
In January when Diaz learned of the shut-down of the classes, he created the video below, describing the caravan. Since then, it has picked up steam and media attention. He was on Democracy Now! last week and the New York Times featured the caravan on its page of "interesting things to do this week" in Texas.
I think I have become a bit self absorbed lately. But then, who cares. I am pregnant, and I have high range of hormones and estrogen. Self absorption should be included in the whole package. After this pregnancy with Peanut, I am not sure how soon I will get knocked up again to show off the popping belly. Gotta squeeze the best out of this occasion. For sure!
There is an awesome thing going on right now called, “Constacon.” It is the mecha of finding games to play in. Just start a Google+ account (if you don’t already have one) and sign up to run a game via the awesome that is Constacon.
‘Living cribs’ have been around since at least the 12th century, and by the mid 14th century England was following the German traditions that dramatized the entire Christian Story in a cycle of so-called ‘Mystery Plays’ performed outside the churches. There’d been history plays before, of course, and even Greeks and Romans enjoyed drama about their own heroic roots, but the Christian ‘Mystery Plays’ were the forerunners of modern theatre - realistic, down-to-earth, and often bawdy. I remember being mildly shocked when I first read a scene in (I think) the York Cycle, where Joseph makes some very blunt remarks about Mary’s claims to virgin pregnancy and her relationship with this dodgy bloke called Gabriel. A stand-up comic today might be censured for such jokes – but the 13th century saw nothing disrespectful in them. They were bringing the Christmas story to life, making it real, taking it off its pedestal and helping people understand what its true impact would have been.
The perspective I gained from all of this, well, I get it now... the saying... "If it weren't for the cancer part... Cancer would be the best thing in the world."
This American Life chose to pull the original show, which was one of their most popular, and to run a retraction, because what they said was the truth was suddenly suspect. And they didn't just run a retraction at the bottom of the blog on a Sunday morning, they did an entire show on the retraction, including interviews with both the Marketplace reporter and with Daisey himself, in all its uncomfortable glory. Its good reporting and good radios - go give it a listen.
We walked to Sagrada Familia again. We thought of visiting Sagrada mercat (market) as we spotted it yesterday from the hop on and hop off bus. My nephew spotted playground in front of the Church and decided to enjoy himself first. Meanwhile my sister took the opportunity to snap photos of the church.
Equinox came and went and still it rained. Still the winds blew. It was as if the hurricane season of Florida had not only exported its rhyme, but all of its storms:
I’m 18 and my parents are in their 60’s and they are always talking about historical events, people, music, movies, etc, that happened during their prime. Of course, there have been MANY historical events that have taken place within my lifetime this far but what really gets me thinking about what I’m going to tell my grand kids is song lyrics.
Sun, stress and fatigue can take their toll on the delicate skin around the eyes. And that's where you'll often see the first signs of aging. So we know you'll be excited by the newest addition to our innovative TimeWise® skin care family, TimeWise® Age-Fighting Eye Cream. It was created specifically for the skin around the eye area and formulated to deliver age-fighting benefits.
We used artistic license and added a head band to match the uniform. Marilyn’s original costume had no hat or head piece but we thought this would make the costume more wearable as a waitress/ maid’s uniform.
In 1986, the Conservatorium had an excellent string program, and it seemed logical to expand the orchestral program out to a full “Symphony Training Orchestra”, as the group was known until the early 1990s. Bev Brownlee, mother of the one of the viola-playing students, had an idea to complete a submission to the then BHP’s community donations program to fund the purchase of new instruments and pay for tutors and scholarships.
up at 4 a.m to spend hours
“If I had grown up in that house I couldn't have loved it more, couldn't have been more familiar with the creak of the swing, or the pattern of the clematis vines on the trellis, or the velvety swell of land as it faded to gray on the horizon . . . . The very colors of the place had seeped into my blood.”
Learn not to fear death.
Being right in the middle of a laundromat, you can change your cash into quarters until you run out of money in the CHANGE MACHINES. If you get thirsty, you can go right next door to one of Telegraph Avenue's premier dive bars, The Avenue! Across the street is U & I liquor, actually my favorite liquor store in the area after the one on 40th and Broadway got shut down. Just one block away to the south you can get pizza and a pint at Lanesplitter, and one block to the north, you can get the $3.99 medium take out special from Pizza Nation. Eating pizza (along with wearing hi-tops, having a mustache, and listening to thrash metal) is one of the cornerstones of a serious Galaga player's lifestyle.
I have some pictures to post from last Saturday, which I will post forthwith. I am pleased that lately pictures of me have been turning out fairly decent, though I have been making an effort to give the "wide eyed half Mona Lisa thinking far away thoughts" smile every time a camera is pointed at me. It hides my stark fear at the prospect of yet another crappy photo being taken.
“Turn not away Thy face from Thy child” (ver. 17). And this is a commending of humility; “from Thy child,” that is, “from Thy little one:” because now I have been rid of pride through the discipline of tribulation, “turn not away Thy face from Thy child.” This is that beautiful mercy of God, whereof he spake above. For in the following verse he explaineth that whereof he spake: “For I am troubled, speedily hearken Thou unto me.” What is “speedily”? Now there is no cause why Thou must defer it: I am troubled, my affliction hath gone before; let Thy mercy follow.
#8 Bob Janjuah of Nomura International: "Germany appears to be adamant that full political and fiscal integration over the next decade (nothing substantive will happen over the short term, in my view) is the only option, and ECB monetisation is no longer possible. I really think it is that clear and simple. And if I am wrong, and the ECB does a U-turn and agrees to unlimited monetisation, I will simply wait for the inevitable knee-jerk rally to fade before reloading my short risk positions. Even if Germany and the ECB somehow agree to unlimited monetisation I believe it will do nothing to fix the insolvency and lack of growth in the eurozone. It will just result in a major destruction of the ECB‟s balance sheet which will force an ECB recap. At that point, I think Germany and its northern partners would walk away. Markets always want short, sharp, simple solutions."
1 significant
When the researchers combined curcumin with piperine, they found that the piperine increased the bioavailabity of curcumin by 2,000% in humans. Piperine is an alkaloid that’s responsible for the pungency of black pepper.
I don't know about you, but I'd like to
He replies: “I find that I am fascinated by his intelligence, by his dedication. The only thing that frustrates me about Robert Mugabe is that he is so damned incorruptible…. The problem is he was educated by the Jesuits, and when you get the combination of a Jesuit and a Marxist kind of philosophy merging in one person, you’ve got a hell of a guy to deal with.”
I can't believe that May is already here, I am so excited for summer!!!
The rest of the time, they’re talking about rock but playing some insipid dribble that wouldn’t pass muster in a children’s toy commercial. It’s like when Channel 4′s Faking It had a straightlaced Cambridge choirgirl trying to pass herself of as a “rock chick”, but her mentor on the show – a girl I vaguely knew – didn’t really understand what rock ‘n’ roll was about either so the result was an excruciating mess. You need more than image and more than attitude. Ultimately, it’s about the music, which is why nerdy goofball Jack Black’s endeavours generally convince.
Today, I decided to go and get my hair done today. Just got it washed and pressed. And I swear this is the second time that I went to the local beauty college in my area, and they got my hair just the way I wanted it. And they did it without me getting a permed. I will be back every Tuesday and may some Friday’s. I’ve been getting a lot of compliments on my hair…so the public loves it…lol
She continued, “They know your history. What you’ve seen. How you’re against the death penalty and why. For all your faults, Tru, you’re the best reporter I’ve ever known. You get to the heart of the story like nobody else. I think you should consider it.”
black riding boots and as many pairs of socks
1/4 c. sherry vinegar
However, they ruled that the soldiers were justified in opening fire as they thought the IRA men had moved towards their positions and they believed they were under attack.
The myth that it rains in the UK ALL the time is easily dispelled by two things 1) Living here for a period of time and 2) Living in the South East for that period of time.
Missional.
I certainly feel WD is lacking something at the stage that I saw in earlier editions and what I know I'll see in later ones. It seems kind of in a rut at the moment.
And we should wrestle with that. While his statements may accurately describe much of American Christianity, I believe and hope that they don’t characterize reformed churches to the same extent. But even if that’s true, even if we desire consistency in upholding all of Scripture, let us strive to be blameless in this area. Even if unbelievers continue to mock, let’s at least believe and teach the whole Bible: shellfish, slavery and all. Let’s glory in how the new covenant frees us from dietary restrictions, how everyone (slave or free) is on the same playing field before the cross and how Jesus came to cleanse and forgive us at the very deepest levels, even our sexuality.
beautiful young girl (about sixteen years old) stands in front of
So – I promised you some conclusions – which would not be answers but questions. And here they are.
Mommy- "Yes, some girls have long hair, Tre."
2. What is the best writing tip you've ever been given?
Officers recovered a .9-mm handgun from inside the home, which they said is believed to be the weapon Puig used to shoot her husband.
-We set up a picnic blanket on the lawn and ate lunch outside, since the kitchen was such a mess. It was quite nice...
Previously, Putfontein created a combined income of R7 million a year, on which taxes were paid. Now there is nothing, and R13 million of taxpayer’s money is down the drain. The claimants now own two excellent pieces of farm land in the North West Province which produce absolutely nothing. At a handing-over ceremony in the year 2000, Land Affairs Minister Thoko Didiza urged the Batloung tribe to keep to their promise on land utilization. “It is important that this land be put to production instead of being turned into a squatter camp. You should not fail us. After a year I will visit this place and I want to find it in its current state or better”. (1)
Someone to share my hopes & dreams with. Someone who makes me laugh every single day. Someone I can wipe out in front of and not feel embarrassed. Someone whose shoulder I can cry on. Someone I can share my secrets with. Someone I can disagree with on silly issues, but is always on the same page with the things that truly matter. Someone who looks toward the future in the same direction as I do.
Here is a later version of the paper under discussion (the site with the original is down due to Internet attacks): ”An exploration of trends in normalized weather-related catastrophe losses”, Robert Muir-Wood and Auguste Boissonnade, Chapter 12 (pp. 225-247) in Climate Extremes and Society (editors Henry F. Diaz and Richard J. Murnane), published 2008. Per Roger Pieke Jr (source) the original was a background paper prepared for a workshop he organized in partnership with Munich Reinsurance in 2006. That paper was not published by the IPCC deadline for inclusion, nor was it peer reviewed, nor did it strongly support the claims made by the IPCC. But it was highlighted anyway.
Bad Press? Rush a policy announcement on the friday.
The ANC's knee-jerk response to any criticism, blaming white interests or parties, and an automatic defence of ministers, party leaders or judicial candidates because they are black, intensifies this polarisation. Of course there are lots of white racists in South Africa, and race clearly remains a fundamental factor in the distribution of resources and opportunity in the country.
To do this, I invested in a new 3 gallon Better Bottle, since equipment that's been exposed to Brett is notoriously difficult to clean thoroughly. I don't know what Mrs. Muckney Brewing is going to say about a carboy sitting in the dining room for six months, but oh, well.
I Guess that’s why they call it the Blues
I hope that all of you are having a wonderful summer.
Schick: No.
“I think I like this new policy”, he says to himself. “Okay”, said the Angel to the second man. “Welcome to the Kingdom of Heaven.”
Navarro and Autry point out that as a consequence of China's becoming the world's "'factory floor,' it must consume half of the world's cement, nearly half of its steel, one-third of its copper, and a third of its aluminum." Even more alarming is the fact that "by the year 2035, China's oil demand alone will exceed that of total oil production today for the entire world."
Kevin "Thank you! Thank you! Happy birthday"
"But how?" the lawyer asked:
Do you use your basement? Is it finished?
God's blessings on your Mother's Day loved ones!
I found a new family doctor this summer, a rarity in my city due to its population and the lack of available physicians. In my first interview, she takes a look at my plethora of symptoms and promptly asks if anyone has ever mentioned ‘Crest’. Confused about the relevance of toothpaste, I ask her to explain. Seems there’s an autoimmune disorder out there called Limited Scleroderma, or CREST syndrome (the acronym doles out the five core symptoms). We review them and I go home, shaking and realizing I have four of five. My respiratory health has taken a sharp decline without explanation; CREST can create blockages in the lungsm reducing capacity. Reflux? CREST causes that too, due to abnormalities in the body tissues. Spider veins? Check. Raynaud’s Phenomenon, an affliction of the hands and fingers where cold sends all circulation running away and leaves them white and icy, is a problem I’ve had since my teens. But it’s the joint issues, where CREST creates pressure due to abnormal collagen, that should have screamed out to someone I saw: multiple GPs, two rheumatologists, three physiotherapists, and a gastroentologist. New doctor retests me for that pesky antinuclear antibody: it comes up positive.
This winter just seems longer and colder and more miserable than it should be. If you don't hear from me for a while, check under the deck... or better yet the comforter.
But if there’s one thing that we know for sure -- and that is that the solution to childhood obesity is not going to come from Washington alone. There is not one single expert that we’ve talked to that said that the solution to this problem is for government to tell people what to do. That just doesn’t work.
In any event, I say all of this to say that an affair isn’t necessarily always “bad”. I’m not glorifying it, and I’m not condoning, it, but if someone had asked me if they were a bad thing ten years ago, I would have answered with a resounding “yes.” But, now that I have been in one, it’s not so black and white anymore. For a long time I thought I was an awful person because of what I did and that some bad karma would follow me for the rest of my life. And, that’s just not true – I am still a good person- I file my tax returns on time every year, I go to church, I give to charity – both money and my time, I go above and beyond to help family and friends, and these days, I even donate time to teach little girls how to bake, how to do embroidery, and how to compose a “real” letter. I think all of those things are “good” things. Does the fact that I care for and love someone who is married make me a “bad” person? Of course it doesn’t. It makes me human, it makes the man I was involved with human. And, we’re not going to hell because of it, either. Because fornicating is wrong, too, and God knows I’d be going straight to hell with no detours as I am high up on the fornicating pole!
So, I went to our local GLBT lobby day at the state capitol yesterday. Missouri is a deep red state, so I normally end up talking to Republicans at these events. This time, the group I was with were assigned a "conservative Democrat." I think I would rather have drawn another Republican. I won't name him--I still want his support for the non-discrimination law and safe schools act we were pushing--but, lemme tell you, when he launched into a spiel about how conservative his district is and how he's obligated to represent all of their views, I started getting pissed. And when he suggested that the non-discrimination bill might result in "reverse racism," it was all I could do to keep from slapping him. I held my tongue. Did I mention that this guy was a Democrat? Yeah. Really. My forbearance was epic.
There is a long way for you guys to be reporters in its true sense. Activists you maybe.
I love the aroma of fresh brewed coffee, the smell of coffee beans, the variety, the cup, the art of the barista, my senses come alive.. some people like black coffee, some people like white coffee. It’s just an acquired taste.
Gorgeous cover aside, this is a thrilling addition to the seemingly unstoppable wave of new dystopian fiction. Mia is a lightning addict. She's been struck so many times that she has a positive charge all her own, and doesn't feel truly alive until a storm brews overhead, setting her skin tingling and her energy reaching out to draw the lightning down. For now, however, she has quite enough on her plate trying to keep her family together in the aftermath of the great earthquake that shook LA a month ago. Thousands are homeless and starving, her mother is wracked with anxiety after her near-death experience, and now she and her brother must go back to school in order to qualify for food rations. But things aren't going to go back to normal for Mia anytime soon. Two warring cults are rising, both proclaiming that the end of the world is coming, that a great storm will herald the beginning of the apocalypse - and that Mia is the key. Throw Jeremy into the mix - a beautiful tormented boy who sees visions of the future and warns Mia away from both the darkly mysterious Seekers and the super-religious Followers - and the scene is set for a cracking good read (no pun intended)!
It all begins with an idea. Sadly, mostly these ideas come to right before I fall asleep, and I’m too tired to get up and write them down. I did, however, remember the idea to write this, so there’s always something.
If you're as busy as I've been lately, you've probably noticed that I've been a bit more quiet than usual here on the blog. Things at work have been a little bit hectic. My amazing, wonderful boss who I love is leaving and her last day is this Friday so things have been really busy at work just trying to transition everything.
One girl has taped her carefully typed schedule to the wall above her section of table. I stopped to look at it the other day. She has every minute until the end of the year planned out and it's color coded. It made me want to run upstairs and put my head under my pillow.
The Republicans make no bones about their resentment of the aide given to both the poor and single moms while saying nothing about The huge amounts given to Corporate welfare. When it cost less to buy a condo than it does to rent one then we do know that the restraints or safety net for the poor has become a joke.
Much has happened since the writing of the above message, but the events during the past eleven months have strengthened my views on I expressed in December last year.
Read-alike Versus Battles - This idea will shake up the bracket system used in previous years. Instead, books will be nominated in read-alike pairs. Vampire Academy VS. House of Night, Hush Hush VS. Fallen, etc. You pick two very similar books to battle it out to see which is the best of the pair. One winner will be declared for each pair, so for this battle no ultimate winner will be chosen.
The nobility, according to Kelsier, is a group that should be slaughtered since they support the Lord Ruler. However, when Vin attended her first party we get a glimpse inside their world. On the surface, I saw comparisons to southern plantation owners before the American Civil War. While their workers are slaving away making fortunes for their owners, the nobles are attending balls every night and living the high life. But then Vin meets Elend and I felt that Sanderson wanted us to see that not all of them are horrible like Lord Tresting. At one point Elend comments that he doesn’t like the House Venture since they are “an ostentatious lot, even for high nobility. They can’t just have a party, they have to throw the best party. Never mind that they run their servants ragged setting it up, then beat the poor things in retribution when the hall isn’t perfectly clean the next morning.” Elend does not fit Kelsier’s description to me.
“We went and he met us after the game,” J. Dimps says. “He wanted to meet me more than I wanted to meet him. It was awesome.”
citizen to our country we do think that you should not only obey the
When I'm very relaxed, very tired, or I just wake up in the morning, my voice is VERY deep and rumbly. During the day, my vocal cords tend to tighten up, particularly as my stress level increases, or I get excited; and my voice gets higher, and tighter.
What veggies do you eat, and what is your favorite way to prepare them? I would love some feedback from everyone!
Seeming to be the chimes of freedom flashing
Why the difference? Orlando and Verba speculate that more populous areas have more resources for entrepreneurs.
BFTS draws are made up of the Top 30 ranked riders in the world standings, and the Top 5 money earners from the Touring Pro division (who are not already ranked in the Top 30). The final five spots include exemptions and alternates.
It's been fun so far!
-- Zazou
You know how you love to people watch? So do I.
If BMI is such a basket case – why is BA taking it over?
Now that you’ve spent a few minutes of your busy day reading about how you can properly sell your home in any market, the next step is to obviously put these tips to work for you via action. It’s not always going to be easy to sell a home, but using these tips will help to simplify the process.
My guess is Dad did not buy the number stencils
Nadja Bender, after Burberry, London, February 2012.
real real real bad.
Would you see the imprisoning and enslaving and exploiting of sentient beings as fair or just or moral...if you might be one of the sentient beings exploited?
What we have to go over every this? Head-to-head contact is common state of transmission. The ancient Egyptians were infected with them, as shown in the dehydrated lice and nits in mummies. Repeated chemical treatments can not be a great idea due to the potential dangers of prolonged exposure to pesticides. So, how to get rid of these annoying parasites? There are numerous over-the-counter treatments that you can try to contain Pyrethrin and permethrin. A lot people believe that you get lice dirty, but this is not necessarily real.
#2 - Shelby
It would be easy to blame UKTV but we do not believe it is their fault that the show has not been promoted sufficiently. To be honest Richard is taking it a lot harder than I am. He believes, quite rightly I feel, that we both have a lot to offer day time TV. He still believes adamantly that our style is unique.
Opponents say the project will be difficult to implement because most of the country’s indigenous languages have little or no script and limited vocabularies.
Gonna write in a minute. This is a nice way to limber up though. Thinking about Takeshi Kovacs, the MC of “Altered Carbon”. The story really is derivative, so much so that it sort of transcends derivation and becomes a kind of catalog of cyberpunk memes or homage. There’s a generous dose of Blade Runner in there too.
So Topps kindly represented 68.42% of the '74 Cubs in the '75 set.
Vente Privee (vente-privee.com) is a European private shopping site located in Paris, France. Vente privee (in French, ventes privées) was founded in 2001 and is a pioneer of private shopping. Vente Privee allows to purchase designer clothing with up to 70% discount off retail prices. It organizes fashion designer brand sales events over a limited period of time (typically 2–4 days), available only to members. Membership is 100% free.
And what about the children?
The presence of this CD provides an alternative for listeners to enjoy the sound of the guitar without using electricity or ‘Amplified’.
regular public schools have a pay scale that is based on years of teaching
Per person:
Thank-you for supporting those who create handmade with handmade.
ARTICLE 3
The founder of the MDL, Aki Nawaz, has said that that ‘it is time British Muslims were more assertive of their rights’. Really? As if British Muslims haven’t already been ‘assertive of their rights’ almost every single day, whether about blacking out the windows of swimming baths, forcing the police to apologise about CCTVs, or getting British non-Muslim politicians to apologise about the Danish cartoons of Mohammed. Every day the Muslims assert this and that and every day they usually get what they want. So when Aki Nawaz says that ‘British Muslims should be more assertive’ he means that Muslims should assert their rights to everything they want – everything! – including Sharia law. I am sick and tired of Muslims asserting their rights. They do it every day. Now this Islamist upstart has the audacity to say that Muslim should shout louder and more often - until the whole non-Muslim edifice falls down.
That’s actually very difficult to find out. The most I was able to discover about it was contained in the Strib article from 1998, “Kids Learn English But Stick with Native Tongues, Too”:
- Michael E. Mann, director of the Pennsylvania State University’s Earth System Science Center
The old and the new mix here craftily enough for Asakusa to end up on my map- here began the search for original fabric that has somehow morphed into a haphazard yet gorgeous splash of pagodas and skyscrapers…I haven’t had time to fix these pictures, forgive the warped angle!
So yesterday, I walked circles around the island in my kitchen for an hour testing out my new skill of walking. I relish it. Me. Walking. On. My. Own.
7. Let your body gently sway, it will naturally want to do this.Feel out for the ‘stuff that was done to you in this life and beyond’ file.
Later I will tell them how to ground this energy, and how to be an effective light-bearers, and why they were created.
Another photography jewel right in my own OC backyard is Susan of Susan Keller Photography. I found Susan on I Heart Faces (another incredible resource if you're feeling confident) and was instantly drawn to her beautiful work. Her family location shoots are breathtaking. I've been fortunate to work with Susan privately on photographic and post editing training and she is another one of those special, talented, patient souls. I'm seeing a pattern here ~ I need patient people working with me when it comes to digital photography!
Fixed mortgage rates hit new all-time lows this week as anemic economic growth and inflation took rates to unheard depths.
APRIL 1971
Following its debut in The Matrix, so-called “bullet time” was quickly adopted by a number of video games, and now cyber-security researchers at the University of Tulsa are employing the concept.
Hurrah! To most people this little sample of garter stitch is no big whoop but to me this is a massive achievement. I attempted to learn how to knit when I was ten and failed miserably. I just couldn't get my head round it. And for the following years even the simple task of casting on evaded me. I don't know what it was, knitting dyslexia maybe, but the directions in all the books I read just didn't make sense. In the end I learnt to chrochet which made more sense and from that I was able to translate knitting guides... Then finally it clicked. Sort of. It's still a huge learning challenge for me and doesn't come naturally at all BUT it's a lesson in how I can learn creativity as well as be naturally gifted.
This is the image of the group of cards taken from ebay
You may be aware of some areas of imbalance, for example if you are single but desperately wish to be loved your relationship segment more than likely will score low. The impact that this may have on other areas that you hadn’t considered maybe of a surprise to you.
1/4 lb asparagus, cut into 1" chunks
Package details: These books will be packaged separately. The books are on former President Carter’s desk at the Carter Center waiting for his signature. He is signing these copies just for our auction. They may not be available at auction close but should be available shortly after.
Disease of the Electrical System
Spinach. Mushrooms. Onion. Garlic. Blue cheese. Crust. That’s all you'll find in this amazing melty marvel. No sauce. No sautéing. No seasoning. Yet surprisingly, this savory dish turned out to be one of the tastiest meals I’ve made so far.
I want you to have them open me up and
and staying positive! :)
But relatives at the time of the drowning kicked up a hullabaloo about the council’s responsibilities.
A typical family objective cited frequently in the financial planning process is a desire to assist children in obtaining a college education. Life insurance can be used in the estate planning process to ensure that the desired level of funding for education will be available. This illustrates the need to coordinate estate planning with the traditional lifetime financial planning needs of a family.
I had to stop midway through this post to do something else. Since I started writing this post, I officially decided I’m going to wait until after work to see how I feel regarding working out. I’m going to listen to my body on this one. If I suddenly feel recharged and refreshed, I’ll go ahead and workout. If I’m still feeling sluggish and tired, I’ll just chill out. It’s the best idea that there is, I believe. As of right now, I need a nap.
Neither Westminster Crown Court nor Dewani’s legal team would comment on the amicus curiae application.
(5) The parts of an outdoor area of the premises that may be designated outdoor smoking areas shall be clearly demarcated
I realize that you have a great need to expand your market. After all, who needs a skinny refrigerator until they see one and suddenly think – oh, damn I really need one of those?
Salt and ground black pepper (I use normal white pepper)
Christian Faria Loading up the truck and van to drive back to Holland.
And, yes, I'll pay for the postage. Delivery only, though.)
The Declaration of Independence is the first of two source documents upon which our nation was founded. This document puts forward the concepts of individual sovereignty and freedom from ruler-ship of all kinds. The Declaration of Independence was a statement adopted by the Continental Congress on July 4, 1776, which announced that the thirteen American colonies, then at war with Great Britain, regarded themselves as independent states, and no longer a part of the British Empire. John Adams put forth a resolution earlier in the year which made a formal declaration inevitable. A committee was assembled to draft the formal declaration, to be ready when congress voted on independence. Adams persuaded the committee to select Thomas Jefferson to compose the original draft of the document, which congress would edit to produce the final version. The Declaration was ultimately a formal explanation of why Congress had voted on July 2 to declare independence from Great Britain, more than a year after the outbreak of the American Revolutionary War. The Independence Day of the United States of America is celebrated on July 4, the day Congress approved the wording of the Declaration.
Put it in the oven and bake until it is fairly dark brown and reads at least 180 on your instant read thermometer. That will be between 30-40 minutes. Let cool 5 minutes and gently release from the pan. There you go! One of my best sellers at the church bakery.
“Dr Ted Eisenberg!” he announces grandly. “He’s the plastic surgeon who holds the world record for the number of breast operations. Just think of all the positive publicity he’d get for us. We’d be the destination of choice for women with boob-jobs the world over!”
In every blogger's life, stuff happens that you just can't write about... and I am there right now. Lots of interpersonal strangeness on my job, people unexpectedly coming and going, and I'm sorry to say I can't tell you about any of it.
The Great Gatsby is a strange book for me to review. Exciting neither great love nor great loathing, even I find my own opinions of it rather dull. I read the story in a rather matter-of-fact frame of mind and finished it without feeling any great emotion or shock. The story simply began, padded along and then rolled serenely to a close. As I clapped the covers together, having finished, I didn’t feel any strong emotions, rather just an “oh, so that’s how it ends” reaction. It seems odd to me that a book such as The Great Gatsby should feel more alien to me than, say, a book set hundreds of years ago like Middlemarch or a story about a gender-shifting Duke like Orlando…but it does.
“If you were me, the whole universe would flip upside down,” I teased her.
BEST ORIGINAL SCORE FOR AN ACTION/ADVENTURE/THRILLER FILM
The list ranges from normal to not so normal and apparently now includes how many miles I should be able to run. Excellent.
I think that the building complex was a combination of ancient and modern styles, with an above ground ancient castle-like structure on the top of a hill-like bridge area, and with the under structure and underground parts being more modern probably; and I think that the two opposing groups probably reminded me a bit of something from The Chronicles Of Narnia maybe, with a human prince leading one group and a White Witch/Queen Jadis-like female being leading the other group, but I am not sure.
My Dearest Ambassador,
Now, I just need to order the paint and paint the desk and dresser. Oh, and she has a big wicker chair that needs to be painted too. It's starting to come together nicely and she's so happy with it that she's actually keeping her room clean so that she can enjoy it. Win-Winn!!
As you can see I was scared my film photos were not going to turn out, having previously been used to digital cameras. I see a lot of improvement in my skill and acceptance that I got the shot because I know how the settings work. So the next time you see a water tower think about how they might be needed if a disaster or alien space craft visits us one night. I did end up surviving the trip and found out that Piqua really is not much different that most towns. But who has more water towers?
Seeing as may is the month before the pantheon of games, otherwise know as E3, we will be releasing an E3 predictions post, just a post of all our hopes, wants and dreams also you are free to add what you may like in the comments section as always. Also this month i have been working on getting an emulator set up on my computer to record some gameplay of old playstation games that some modern gamers may have never played before, mostly being PS1 but that will mist likely be half way through may no later.
Chromaroma will import the user's Tube, bus and bike journey history, awarding points for each trip. For each user, Chromaroma tracks statistics on the number of swipes, achievements, “missions,” “collections,” places, identities, modes of transport, seasonal highlights and passengers encountered as the user travels around the city, along with the number of stations “captured,” records set and overall rank. By watching their own travel details, users can investigate new ways to travel and new destinations; "multipliers" and bonus points are available by working with a team, building up connections with fellow passengers, and discovering “mysteries” attached to a particular location. Beyond competition and conquest, Chromaroma's gameplay “opens up the beauty in the city's transport flows and reveals to its most persistent players some of the mysteries of travel, and even the strange characters travelling through the tunnels in the centre of the system, who may hold the secrets to your city.”Gaming is used successfully for call center motivation as employees create teams and vie to win trips by most successful calls. Who would guess gaming can be motivating rather than distracting!
Friday's are my day's to post over at the Great Impressions Blog and this was my card for the week. If you haven't been over there to check it out...you need to...there is some amazing talent and there is a new post daily!
Bilderberg Group (Founded by Jesuit priest Joseph Retinger, S.J. and
MGDKI Blog (mgdkiblog.wordpress.com) is a participant in the Amazon Services LLC and Amazon EU Associates Programmes designed to provide a means for sites to earn advertising fees by advertising and linking to amazon.com, amazon.ca, amazon.co.uk, amazon.de, amazon.fr, amazon.it and amazon.es. Certain content that appears on this website comes from Amazon Services LLC and/or Amazon EU. This content is provided “as is” and is subject to change or removal at any time.
I know someone who was very proud of the position they had achieved at work, and gave themselves all the credit. It was true that they worked very hard, and did a great job. What she didn’t know is that God was in control and allowed her hard work to thrust her forward. She didn’t use her position for his purpose, and she did not exalt the Lord in her actions. She was not grateful to the Creator. She did not humble herself and give God the glory. This woman I know is a child of God because she was disciplined by the Most High himself. She had the best numbers anyone could expect, she was doing everything right in her job. For no reason at all her job was eliminated. It made no sense. In that moment, God had her attention. She remembered she was not in control and she began to pray. Even though she didn’t correct all her imperfections she humbled herself and relied on the Lord for the first time in a long time. The Lord guided her through 6 months without a job. Her faithfulness brought her into a new position closer to family making even more money than before. It was amazing to watch how the Lord worked in a faithful sinners life. Our God is an AWESOME God! He delivered grace and forgiveness to someone who had forgotten about him. Like a parent, he brought her back into his protection.
“Susan & Sabrina did a wonderful job, they are easy to communicate with, they were willing to put in extra time and work in getting our house ready to sell.”
We never really expected to get a new kidney so quickly. Both transplant teams told us to expect long waits, although the Philadelphia team was more optimistic. Right now we are at our home-away-from-home with my sister-in-law near Philly.
If you need to sign up by October 31st, 2011 if you want to participate.
Scoop 1/4 c batter for each cookie, 3 inches apart and flatten mounds with a moistened palm of your hand. I just used a tablespoon to form balls and they were plenty big.
Did you notice that part about the day trip? Stay tuned for a few printables that will help make day trips a breeze! Up next week, I'm also going to share our linen/bathroom storage solutions, and I haven't forgotten about the mudroom before, during and after reveal. I'm just playing hooky from that stuff today!
and some even take on the responsibility of nobly and wholeheartedly fostering other children
Oh and also... there are no pimps here at Our Tiny Place.
the "mother's" and "ma-ma's" all day long.
Next up: Brida, my brown ewe.
“Our past success is impressive and we can build off of this success to overcome what we are facing today as a result of the weak national economy.”
Now let us quit on something you need – will you end up picking internet marketer marketing applications or something for your company only? It will depend on you and your abilities. Most individuals recommend beginner to cope with internet marketer marketing applications only but who knows – if you are blessed and you have got time, dreams to perform online –why not?
So, as a welcome back, I've got 4 new pieces of stationery for you guys - and I also wanted to pose something new - a special request day. You, my lovely followers can post throughout the week as to what you would like to see thematically in the stationery I post on the following Stationery Request Day - let's say Wednesday. Request Wednesdays. Sounds good to me - so - post comments to let me know what you would like. Some ideas are: Piano's, ladies, pink, friends, newspaper - anything, really. If I can find it, I'll make it for you.
Feel free to go through my posts this month! I'd love to see what you think!
Maybe Jessica Alba should shun showing her entire body to an eager audience since her body may prevent the audience from noticing the rest of her. Some actresses may be very comfortable wearing shorts on magazine covers but being nude on the big screen can be like a photographer without a camera on Carnival Day.
Be aware of your first scene. This is where the curtain lifts and unveils your character’s world. You’ve already written their universe, having spent months (or years) crafting the novel and revising it. You know who this person is, what they are about to undertake, and how their world is going to evolve. (And evolve it should, or else your reader is going to lose interest quickly.) You’ve seen how it all comes to pass. So give your opening chapter the cause and affect that will carry the reader into their written world and allow them to fall in love.
A couple of months ago, I had the opportunity to teach a class on photography. It was a very interesting, and nerve wracking experience. See, I don't do things the way other people do them. Most of the time I learn things the hard way, and in an expression of my "male-ness," I NEVER ask for directions. I work at something, and weary it, until I finally get ahold of it. I do this with my photography, and I do it with my piano playing.
Grateful to have a family whom I love with all my heart.
a book of myths
Don't hold the magnet too close to the nail. The magnet will pull the polish to itself creating a smudge. It's cool to watch but the aftermath....not so much.
very often cakes require a layer of parchment paper to be placed at the bottom of the pan. cutting the rounds to fit one's pan is a tedious and annoying job. usually, it is done by measuring out the dimensions with a compass or placing the bottom of the pan on the paper and tracing the round and then cutting it out.
60. Lord Wasserman - Conservative - Shares in Diageo plc an alcohol drinks company who have been awarded money to teach midwives in England and Wales on the dangers of alcohol. No, you can't make it up. Lansley used to hold a directorship at Profero who had Diageo as one of their clients. Shares in Johnson & Johnson Inc, which supplies the NHS. Shares in Procter & Gamble Co, which supplies the NHS. Walgreen Company - American pharmaceutical company. For more on Walgreens. The bill will give pharmaceuticals even more diverse healthcare providers to build relationships with. Voted loyally on the Health and Social Care bill.
You underestimate the desire of the European political elite to prop up the shambling corpse, no matter what.
Outstanding Lead Actor in a Drama Series
Chronicle: What specifically are you going to do in the next term to work with the tech sector?
So there I am, in the Tor panel at Dragon*Con on the Friday night before Labor Day. Len is showing me a copy of Dreams of Steel II: Brass and Bolts, which contains his story “Dreams of Freedom”. (Yay, Len!) A gentleman comes up to us and hands us bookmarks for his book, Shadowmagic; I exclaim I’m a book blogger (…let’s be honest, I do that a lot, it’s kind of a big part of my identity) and he whips out a copy, signs it, and hands it to me. It turns out that John Lenahan originally published Shadowmagic as a free podcast, which was then published in the UK. He’s seeking American publication at the moment, which was why he was at Dragon*Con, although Tor editors don’t take submissions at conventions. I figured it’d be a cute and unchallenging read while I recovered from con. Little did I realize how unchallenging it would be…
All Windows operating systems are now supported including Windows 7 64bit.
He buys plane tickets as casually as other people buy sweaters. He camps in snowstorms, drops in on world leaders, and plays extreme rubber band games with his family. He travels through danger zones in Uganda to fight injustice against children. He pranks his friends, and totes BB guns. He founded Restore International and works through that organization in India and Uganda. He embraces life in a way that is both inspiring and daunting.
As in any business, you have to find top leaders who are already producing the result you want, find out what system do they use and then simply duplicate.
(Supplies: Echo Park Little Boy paper collection, Papertrey Ink card stock, twine from The Twinery)
Secondly, somewhat more sublimely, we praise Him according as He stands in relation to those contemplating Him in His glory, viz., angelic and human minds, whom He beatifies by means of their contemplation of His ineffable beauty, which they behold as it is, and from whom He eliminates, in this way, all neediness.
Comparing – Two pirates are on a seesaw. The pirate on the bottom holds a watermelon with a fraction. The child needs to select a second watermelon with a fraction larger than the other so that the second pirate can be lowered to the ground. Success results in the pirate walking off with his melon. The pirate drops the watermelon when an incorrect answer is selected.
I thought I was the only person in the world to do such a thing.
And rude.
My personal favorite "underrated" set is 1998 Pinnacle.
Federal Reserve Bank of Cleveland President Sandra Pianalto spoke before a housing services audience in Cleveland, encouraging the community to work together in improving the appeal of living in older, more industrial cities.
Losing the model and the scroll starts a series of events which finds Tintin abducted and imprisoned on a ship, escaping on a lifeboat with the ship's drunken captain Haddock (Andy Serkis), hijacking a seaplane and then crashing it into the desert, finding another model ship with another scroll, and engaging in several chases in several different locales in search of treasure. The treasure is the lost cargo of the real "Unicorn," captained by Haddock's ancestor, and three scrolls will reveal its whereabouts - assuming that Tintin and Haddock can live long enough to get to it.
Everyone Loves a Good Train Wreck, subtitled Why We Can't Look Away, examines why so many of us are fascinated by terrible things: grisly highway accidents, morbid horror movies, etc. In short, easily digested chapters, Wilson considers this issue through personal anecdotes and quotations from authors in a wide range of disciplines.
A few months ago, the advertising industry celebrated the 100th birthday of David Ogilvy.
One of my students gave me one of those tervis tumblers filled with bags of jelly beans. Now I don't normally eat candy like that (I'm a chocolate girl) but I needed something sweet the other night, opened the bag up and well let's just say there's not much of the bag left.
Coming soon Love Bakery - The review and Wedding Cake Madness - Some of the summer of fun!
So please tell me what I ought to be jealous of Joan Wheeler? I really would like to know what she has that I don’t have!
Thank you, AT&T and companies who choose customer service that is nothing short of a pain in the ass.
8. Santo & Johnny - Bull's Eye
Alexander 1, United South 0 (girls): Palmira Martinez scored the game’s only goal in the second half. Elisa Saldivar assisted.
So there is evolution, in other words, in the manifest reality. Evolution happens. That means that the amoeba is, of course, a manifestation of consciousness, and so is the human being. But they are not in the same stage. Evolutionarily, yes, we are ahead of the amoeba. And these theories, these ecological-worldview people, they don’t see that. They don’t rightly understand what evolution is because they are ignoring the transcendent dimension, they are ignoring the purposiveness of the universe, the creative play. Ken Wilber makes this point very, very well in his book Sex, Ecology, Spirituality.
Halle Berry
And dancers within rapture’s golden doors,
It's always exciting and fun to see the beautiful entries ... we love it so much!
Most importantly, how would the minimum set be calculated? To understand that, let us take an extremely simplified test case:
On his return he promptly reneged on all his promises he made before pushing Red Ken off the Gravy Train and taking his seat in first class and dipping his snout into our money.
Well it’s been a long time, long time now
But I do want to know how come some of those priests, monks, religious sisters who take a vow of poverty surround themselves with comfortable living conditions when the poor suffer outside the walls of their “castles.” I can’t figure this because, these monks or priests are the preachers who explain the story of the rich man who went away sad.
I'm home from my school's bounenkai (end-of-year-party / aka "forget the year party") and I'm sipping an Ise Kadoya Weizen Bock, a nice upgrade from the endless flow of Kirin lager supplied by the Ise City Hotel catering staff.
Comedian Jimmy Kimmel basically roasted everyone. Here’s a few of his highlights:
But Emery says prison life is probably harder on Black because he’s older and used to luxury in his life. "I come from a more working class/ middle class background so it’s not so difficult for me," he said.
Later, he had learned that she was Rianne of Duskandar, born to be a warrior-princess, and brought to the castle as a hostage. She and her guardians had only been on the journey through, so they had stayed apart from the rest of the household and guests. When the girl had gone missing, there had not been a great fuss about it, because certain people were not meant to know about her presence at all. They didn't underestimate her afterwards.
"I will of course Green, and thank you. Just thought I'd take a walk through the park to get some air. Then I'm off home to sort my winter clothes out. You can sense it coming can't you?"
People won’t accept it, though, not without a fight. Six months ago, if anyone told me that there would not be mass movements of a historic scale over the next few years, I would have laughed in their faces. Today it’s no longer a prediction, it’s a reality. The Household Tax campign, only two and a half months in, is spectacular, and it’s only the start.
Something that was being pleasure for him, was being pain for her, but she feared putting him off, and the thought of losing him made her knees go jello.
Lord Baelish, the slime, proclaims he has loved Catelyn Stark all these years but that doesn’t keep him from making a distasteful advance moments before presenting Lady Stark with her husband’s bones nor does it prevent him from lying to her. Here viewers receive a small sop to their intelligence in that we are asked to infer the bones of Ned Stark are in the chest which Catelyn opens rather than being shown the bones.
So not a lot of anything...I've studied the ceiling, upped the iron and I'm back on track now. I've even managed to reproduce a mirrored clone of the usual inky mess in my make-shift crafty patch. Yeah!
I got a tub of the Vega on sale and have been adding it to smoothies. It's flavor is a little strong for my taste, but I've found that if I include peanut butter and berries I can tolerate it. I do feel good after I use it, so I'm liking the nutrition it provides.
i may be back someday, but i have no idea if that will be next week or in five years. i'm really not a planner, so we'll see. i hope everyone has a fantastic holiday and please take care to fill your wells each and every day.
He smiled, trying not to laugh, explained what he meant, and I think I understood him correctly (but if not please comment below and further my agricultural education!)
Moll’s Gap was the turning point. After crossing this little pass, I got my first downhill of the day, and with it, my first real speed. Soon after, I entered Killarney National Park. The area was crazy beautiful, with lakes and islands jutting out of the lakes. However, I was too cold and wet to really appreciate it. The ride was gorgeous, and fun in a “I can’t believe I’m doing this – it’ll be a great story later” kind of way. I felt disappointed, and somewhat ungrateful, that this was supposed to be the highlight of my bike trip but I saw most of it through my peripheral vision as I kept my head down and pedaled. I wanted to get out of the rain and cold as quickly as possible, plus pedaling made me feel warm at least.
Do these contradictory value messages add up to a marketable brand? Or will they relegate ‘Los 33’ to the realm of key-ring fobs, picture postcards, and other tourist trivia? These are not questions for the trade mark attorney to answer, yet he must be sensitive to them if he is to advise on the extent to which registration is necessary and on the contractual which bring in revenue. He must also be wise as to how the licence revenue is accounted for and shared. But that is a subject for another Editorial".
Twitter: @DemonXDiantha
First off, I think I need to check the settings on my camera (seems fuzzier than it should!)
Writing from within a castle or from the gutter?
To analyze what motivates people to write about art, what controls what people write about art, and how and if it should change or stay the same.
I beg you, Dear Reader, do not take it as a *personal* affront- this skewering of Steampunkery- for indeed, one intended to be as broadly offensive as possible, so as to insult the greatest number, with the least amount of verbiage.
My mom loves gizzards and through her, I learned to love them too. Imagine my surprise when I discovered a restaurant today that served an incredible green salad with gizzards and smoked duck, it was fabulous, I thought I had died and gone to heaven. I’ve never had gizzards like that, they were tender and succulent, melt in your mouth and with the added delight of duck, oh my! If only I can figure out how they cooked them. That was only the beginning of my food day! On the way home, I picked up a duck pâté, 4 different cheeses (a cow, a sheep, a goat and a blue), pots de crème (a coffee and a chocolate) and french bread. For dessert, we have lemon meringue tart and some bit of chocolate deliciousness. Yes, I’m going to need to diet when I get home. And I have to say right here and now, when I walked into the cheese shop, the aroma was overwhelmingly delicious, I hadn’t smelled those smells since I lived in New York. Wow, the choices were almost too much to bear!
Cuba Standard: Tampa International Airport is poised to become the first of a series of additional U.S. airports that will be able to offer flights to Cuba.
During the first phase of building the set, I will also be fine tuning the tripods position, height and angle to achieve the desired composition, while in phase two the main focus is in building the set and how it appears through the viewfinder.
Katie made my Grandma's famous carrot cake!
a. Beings who utilize the dark side of the force
My worst one so far is it is important that for the reader to see that Howie, a college freshman, knows what a bandelore is. He has to think it is natural for him to know about bandelores, Packard twin-sixes, and other things from the turn of the century, but so far my beta readers are missing that plot point and laughing at my dialog. So even being able to pinpoint where the problem is doesn't always lead to a solution.
4. Medley: Come On In My Kitchen/Mama, He Treats Your Daughter Mean/Goin' Down the Road Feelin' Bad
And in doing so,
I think that is what’s missing in the show – the mental and social well-being part. These individuals change on the inside, and the show doesn’t explore their struggles. They have touched upon it in seasons, but the focus is on the physical transformation. I’m a big believer in fixing a problem by addressing the immediate need and also identifying the root cause of the problem and addressing that.
We hope you'll hop along with us! You could win this very set just by leaving a comment as you hop along. Next, you'll want to visit Amy and see what fabulous things she's done with this set! Thanks for stopping by!
Something I use in my game; using 2 weapons at once simply changes the damage dice to 2d4 - doesn't matter if it is 2 daggers or 2 swords. It is simple, relatively balanced, and just feels right because you are using 2 dice for 2 weapons.
Part of the reason is that people simply do not follow instructions very well (sorry it’s true).
Zest from 1 lemon (reserved from below)
The other project is my second Ishbel. It is knit from Madelinetosh Tosh Sock yarn which is also very soft but not quite as soft as the above mentioned yarn. I ran out of yarn on the last lace section because I was trying to knit the larger of the lace patterns. Searching online for the same yarn was not getting me anywhere. I found a sweet person on Ravelry that had one skein to spare and thanks to her, I was able to finally finish it. I am still amazed what blocking does to lace and it is fun to see the finished results.
-The silence...?
Do open relationships really work in real life? Not for long, I think. It has to either end or evolve into a committed monogamous relationship eventually.
Everyone wants to think they're raising a genius. Less than 2% of the world's population have a genius IQ. Statistically speaking, you are probably not raising a future Mensa candidate. Seriously, STFU. While being a parent should be part of what defines you, it shouldn't be the only thing that defines you. While you aren't raising a Mensa candidate, you're raising an entitled, spoiled little shit, who (thanks to you) thinks they world revolves around them.
open thread…..
First off, I’d like to apologize for not posting much in the last month. I’ve been busy trying to get my group moving a little more than usual.
Alternative D.J. isnt your friend when hes cashin in on the latest trend
You then need to buy a case of hamburgers, ten pounds of hot dogs, rolls, fifty pounds of ice, twenty half-gallon bottles of caffeine infused soda for the kids, and a keg of the cheapest beer ever created by man. Make sure your grill works, has a new tank of propane, and you have an apron that says something like, “kiss the cook,” “we have an open marriage,” or “I appreciate tips.”
Indian food is incomplete without some absoloutely yummy delicious fragnant golden ghee! Its a very healthy saturated fat, unlike the yucky hydrogenated vegetable oils which are flooding the market, and even better than vegetable oils as well! And before, my post swings away into why ghee is better than oil, I better get back to the recipe!
I have a 14 year old niece who I dote on. She is spoiled. I contribute to that. For the most part I believe she is a good kid just trying to navigate the hurdles that come from being a teenager. Her parents are self-absorbed and are not paying attention. Yes, I said it, they are not paying attention because they are so caught up in their own "childhood nightmares" that they can't even see what is happening to their kid. Not to mention that to them, their daughter is just a pawn in their game with each other of torment and hate. While I can talk to my sister and she is beginning to see the light, the EX is a guy who can't see past his own nose and to him my niece is a piece of property and as long as she is getting good grades and staying out of obvious trouble, then he doesn't have to look any further. He doesn't want to see, he might have to sober up for that.
Cop gets bail in raid shooting case - 28 Nov
I'm finishing an Easter egg wreath now that I saw on Pinterest. Photos when I finish!
Jesus tells us in His Word that we should not get tired of asking Him for the things that we want from Him. But is that what He really meant? And where do we get the idea that is what He wants?
I don’t want to go into an analysis of the Seldon decision. I suspect I’ll be writing quite a lot about it in various places in the time to come and talking about it in employment law updates for the rest of the year. I’m going to be throughly fed up with Mr Seldon by the autumn and no doubt my clients will be too. If you’re keen, you can read the whole judgement here and the press summary here. There are also some excellent legal blogs on the decision from Laurie Anstis on Work/Life/Law and Lewis Silkin’s Age Discrimination info as well as a whole host of commentary and debate if you follow the #ukemplaw hashtag on Twitter. All good stuff.
It was really hard to pick our Top Three this time with so many fantastic entries. Thanks to everyone who participated. Here are the Top Three as chosen by TEAM S.A.S. (in no particular order.) As always, you can visit the Top Three's blogs by just clicking on their names.
All images: Copyright Melanie Hope Greenberg 1993
it can’t be done or that its more expensive she’ll tell you its not.
Bud Cockrell – Vocals, Bass
Wait for it to dry. this could take anywhere from a couple of hours to a couple of days.
08 Please Don't Talk About Me When I'm Gone
Argento is excellent at using lighting and design to create the film's unsettling tone. He frequently focuses on closeups of the film's women — Pat during the opening, Suzy and her new friend Sara (Stefania Casini) later on — as they confront the strange events surrounding them. Faces mean a lot to Argento, faces in various contortions of terror and uncertainty, faces with eyes widened in fear and mouths gasping breathlessly. Agento films Suzy with colored lights washing across her face, especially hovering around her eyes, emphasizing her deer-in-headlights stare. It's obvious that he likes exploring the vulnerability of these women: Suzy seems afraid even before she arrives at the school, in the opening scenes at the airport, as though she's anticipating the rest of the film. The faces of the women, bathed in various colored lights, telegraph the film's mostly abstract horrors, because despite the murders that occur throughout the film, Argento seems more concerned with capturing the pervasive, undirected sense of dread and strangeness that exists within this film, taking hold of these women and slowly driving them to madness.
Favourite Albums
...Say a thanks.
46. Lippy The Lion And Hardy Har Har
By Shaykh Ibrahim Mogra
For couples having an after party, since the night will last longer than four hours, you may opt to change for the cake cutting and continue the celebration in your second dress until the wee hours of the morning.
Looking over at my First Officer I instructed “Lieutenant would you brief our legal team here. I need to get in touch with Central Command. As I walked to the bridge I wondered if the wrong two people were sent.
We had a fantastic dinner at one of my favorite restaurants. Our server even brought over a bottle of champagne. I looked at Dan, but he didn’t order it. Dan told him he had the wrong table and he said, “No I don’t. Its from your Dad.” So sweet.
Breakfast was a slice of bread my neighbor gave me (yes one slice, to display his bread making might) with peanut butter. Lunch was hazelnuts and dried cranberries because I’ve run out of foods that I can take for lunch. Dinner, I was saved by going to my friend’s and eating Chinese food.
Mike DeJean - 3.0 WAR = 1 point
What does that mean? It means that this garment--or several garments, or even a whole wardrobe--is something more than just a body covering. It does more than keep you warm and presentable to the outside world. When you put it on, you feel like you're really yourself. You care about it, and it cares for you. It makes you stronger and happier, more confident and relaxed. When you put it on, you're more yourself. Maybe it's a lucky shirt. Maybe it's a jacket you've embellished. Maybe it's something someone made for you or gave you, and you've worn it and mended it and altered it, and it's one of those things you'd grab if the house were on fire.
I have always been a fan of Britney Spears. I loved her music, her dancing, everything. But then the unfortunate happened and she married the biggest loser on earth. Everything changed. She had 2 kids one after the other. There were events like head-shaving, hard & wild partying with Paris Hilton, wearing pink wigs, etc etc.
3) You can have a complete college experience without ever setting foot in the classroom or interacting with a faculty member. But you cannot have one without football.
And pipes the world back to the simple fabric
Is This The End
Tuesday: Tacos
Labour: 1 vote (4%)
43. The Pop Rivets - Fun In The UK (Demo)
I have come to realize that God is sovereign, and there are things I just don’t understand.
Would you guys be interested in new recipes I'm trying at night to make no carbs more interesting? Just lemme know and I'd be happy to share!
They last longer when they're folded.
He grabbed her hand and led her toward the detached garage, stopping at the door he kissed her. The butterflies returned, and he eased away from her holding her gaze.
First worn: For the photos
can walk out of that darkness a victor today for the Light is coming to you
* Ross Bagdasarian, Jr. as Alvin (singing voice)
Turn and time
Without fail I will always sleep longer than I am meant to. Or at a time when I should probably be doing things instead of catching up on the sleep I didn’t get the night before. This particular morning was a giant struggle.
Amy Winehouse - Coachella Festival, 27 April 2007
Curry leaves - a few
'Making fools of a lot of men???' You got to be kidding me??????? That's a SCARECROW's leg for crying out loud!!! Jesus, just WHO is writing stuff like that? A twelve-year old nerd who'd piss his pants if he saw one nekkid female from a distance of 1,000 yards? Do I have to teach these people EVERYTHING?
As lasagnas go, this one is very simple. No meat, no veggies. I wanted the focus to be on the contrast between the spicy sauce and the delicate freshness of the pasta noodles and cheeses. I found the fresh frozen pasta sheets at Terra Cotta, a small New England chain that specializes in artisan pasta. If you can't find fresh, use no-boil noodles instead.
I have said before that “fat is hate’s physical form.” It explains why, when one begins dealing with their interpersonal issues and allowing God’s will to take priority, constantly sacrificing self-will, the insulation layer we built to keep ourselves protected and isolated begins to melt away along with the need for our addictive substance(s) of choice. Today, I would rather accept hardship as an opportunity to demonstrate God’s omnipotence than to shield myself from any such. The scraping, pulling and tugging on my life is not me being abused, it is the hand of the Creator reshaping and rebuilding me into His useful tool for increasingly noble purposes. More than freedom from physical weight, I rejoice at the liberation from the emotional tonnage that kept me in a constant state of frustration!
That “preservation of rural lifestyle” kinda seems odd to me. I comprehende: outhouse, dirt roads, barb wire, and “go get some water out of the well” in East Texas. Cockfighting a normal local entertainment? No. There were vague rumors of something on a back road where the bootleggers were. But not something normal ordinary people really knew about or attended. Mostly kid talk.
1/2 can of tomato paste
In the near future, a desperate and ever-more controlling UK government attempts to restore a sense of national pride with a New Festival of Britain. But construction work on the site of an old church in south London releases a centuries‑old plague that turns its victims into flesh-hungry ghouls whose bite or scratch passes the contagion – a supernatural virus which has the power to revive the dead – on to others.
.... My exaggerated camera angle doesn't help matters ....
These Lincoln Logs have been a priceless gift for the past few years, Adam Hough. Thank you so much for that!
Song: Shake It Out
I wasn't in Loli this time actually, but I guess I sort of matched with my Liz Lisa floral! I had plans later on the day and I wasn't able to go back home to change so I just decide against Loli.
She starts on him again, after he changes lanes without signaling and two other drivers honk their objections. “Gad,” she begins with a mutter and increases her tone as she speaks. “It’s really a matter of elegance,” and she isn’t aware of the disparaging look on her face. “Remember the zipper?” We all recall the event: a chaotic afternoon commute; a mess of traffic trying to merge from four lanes to two as half the city workers aimed for their homes; horn honking and finger flipping and acceleration lunges when any space opened up; and one driver, a young attractive black man in a big old American sedan, who opened his door and rose to stand on what would be the running board of an older car and almost sang to the crowd: “People! People! Let’s all just make like a zipper!” It was classic, wise, humorous. It happened long enough ago that Keith and Marnie agreed about it, but now she’s brought it up so often when complaining about Keith’s driving that of course it’s one of the sore spots.
Discover how a dad of four little ones learned to blend his corporate responsibilities with the unschooling life
“And did they not show through their actions, implied through their words that they would take care of us? Take care of their people? Pay for the blood, the sweat, yea, even the very lives that have been lost here?”
Although triglycerides are not a cholesterol complex, they are the main form of fat and are very closely linked to cholesterol
There's a line in the movie Galaxy Quest that prompted this. If you haven't ever seen Galaxy Quest, this is a travesty that should be remedied immediately. I quote from it from time to time because a) it is so very quotable and b) it is full of good writery things. *adds "writery" to dictionary*
I tend to think about things quite a bit before I act on something that impacts my life greatly. It took me a while to decide to file bankruptcy but it was the best choice for me. Giving up my house in my bankruptcy was hard but was also a good idea. Now the thought of owning a home gets me all stressed out. So where am I going to live? I’m so tempted to just get a small camper trailer and just hook it up to my car & take off as soon as I can, since it’ll just be me. (And cats)
Me #2: I know, right? You can laminate for FREE at school, duh!
This one is pretty simple, because I’m tired at it’s almost midnight.
And not a post goes by that I don’t wiki something (Wikipedia is half as smart as Encyclopedia and twice as smart as Urban Dictionary):
Largely below the radar, councils have now discovered all sorts of other ways in which they can take money off us, by levying charges, fees and penalties for countless things which used to be free or at least very much cheaper – some of which are actually illegal.
My medications have changed a lot since initial application as have my medical conditions. Take my hidradenitis suppurativa for example, this was only officially diagnosed by a specialist (was diagnosed by GP) in December 2010. This was 2 months after the appeal process had been successfully concluded at Tribunal. Because my conditions are ever changing I’ve kept the DWP informed, several times I have been told by DWP advisors I should be on a higher rate! They, however, aren’t the ones who make the decisions.
Isabelle writes to William, saying how his prison sentence reminds her of her own life because "my whole life has been a sort of prison." She also says she hopes he will get out soon, and that the time he serves may even remind her of how she's felt throughout all these years.
For my fellow inspiring writers out there this fear may resonate with you…Waiting on the editor. I often wonder if the desire to become a published author is some form of self-hate or self-abuse. The utter agony we put ourselves through once we finish a story, an article or whatever master piece our brilliant literary mind came up with, borders torture. At least for me it does. It does not matter how many times my husband tells me my newly written work is “awesomesauce” (his made-up compliment) I always tell myself the story sucks, it could be better.
8. Pot O’ Gold
Time. Have to say it was a pretty amazing experience. I have never felt so comforted and at ease in a medical environment. The doctor was able to tell me problem areas without me having to say anything at all. Pretty amazing stuff.
I took this the evening before they left.
Audience: you go Mitt
Yes, when walking through the streets of Tokyo, one would rarely find a garbage can, if one did not know where to look. Luckily Japanese people both know where to look and know that they should not litter. This goes especially for cigarette butts, that, in european cities, spread like plague. In Japanese society they merely go into the “pocket ashtray”. Maybe it has something to do with Japanese people’s amazing ability to empathize with inanimate objects. (see picture below)
I’m not sure what call J.T. Ready answered but it was the wrong call.
“It’s a great comfort in this difficult time to have such a good friend.”
As for the yeast in her mouth that does appear to be improving ever so slightly. I am going to venture a guess that oral ampho is perhaps one of the worst tasting medications. Although Lucy hates the taste of the med, she is surprising us with her cooperation in allowing us to swab her mouth with it every eight hours. When we first started swabbing her mouth I said half kidding that there are not enough smelly stickers in the tri-state area to bribe Lucy with for the next two weeks, but she is realizing that it is helping to get rid of the very thick and pasty yeast that has plagued her mouth for months. She never ceases to amaze us with her ability to tolerate a new therapy, intervention, or medication. Once she realizes how much better she feels she is willing to allow us to do it, although not without tears and some back arching, this is both comforting and heart breaking.
Abjurations are protective spells. They create physical or magical barriers, negate magical or physical abilities, harm trespassers, or even banish the subject of the spell to another plane of existence.
That said, if you want to go, I’ve checked. The experts say it is safe. London-based travel agency, Expert Africa (Tel: +44.(0)20.8232.9777; expertafrica.com) has been taking tourists to Zimbabwe for more than a decade. Its managing director, Chris McIntyre, says the economy has stabilized now that the U.S. Dollar is the local currency, and the country is now safe for visitors.
Can color be just a effective in small doses?
This may work out ok. Kinda takes all the sting out of the spit or swallow argument!!!
Then there was one IBCLC, Debra Page, who saw him stick out his tongue and said I think he is tongue tied. I asked her to explain because when I worked in the hospital, the babies I saw who were tongue tied could not stick out their tongue past their gums, and if they did, it was heart-shaped on the tip. She said there were different types of tongue tie, the obvious ones are type 1 or type 2, and it looked like Aidan had a type 3 posterior tongue tie. I had never heard of this. She explained that he couldn't elevate or lateralize his tongue, and when he did stick it out, it was duck bill shaped, not pointed.
I will post pictures of our wonderful week of learning later today.
So when someone is sick here we start with simple remedies before we even think about doing to the Doctor we start with the following.
Do I ever regret for one split second falling in love?
There was a time, not so very long ago, when elites from various fields — politics, business, finance, labor, journalism, religion, academe — would gather together and attempt to ameliorate whatever social and economic problems seemed of pressing importance. And they would gather in something like a spirit of enlightened self-interest, if not exactly of disinterest, trying to take a look at problems from a point of view other than that of immediate self-advancement. This, anyway, is what George Packer claims in a recent article in Foreign Affairs. Knowing a little bit about the history of social elites and their relation to the notion of disinterest or impartiality, I’m inclined to agree with him. Here’s what Packer says about the various American elites in the postwar era:
Anyone with connections to the former government or with foreign governments.
“They have to say that,” the informant comments, “for now. There can’t be seen to be any forensics left for people to find. But the Washington view is very clear: they see Merkel as the key US ally, and neither they nor Frankfurt would let her take such a risk. Look, if the ECB is protecting its backside, Berlin has no choice but to follow suit. If she pushes through and gets a deal on Monday, then it really will be proof that everyone in the EU is insane – including her. I just don’t buy that.”
There is, I saw, a fine line between the hard-head and the bone-head. The denialist hard-head swaggers his way through life hearing only what he wants to hear, that warmism is either a hoax, a gross error or just another End-of-the-World scare story. But if you suspend your prejudices and your vanity for a moment, everything changes. You find out that the following statements are true beyond argument.
Example of NJFL Points for one TDA student X for participating in the NJFL Speech Tournament
The naturalistic response to this paper: (links removed)
Also, I really don't need to be a witness to your verbal bashing of people. Ripping someone a 'new one' on your status update and then saying 'You know who you are' is soooo not cool. And, you're probably going to lose a few friends that way. If you're going to bash a frenemy, at least make it amusing for me. Perhaps next time you're pissed at one of your friends, you can try something like "Hey ya'll guess what? Pamela licks skunk ass, that's why she's always talking shit." I'd 'like' that way better than the Mean Girls lingo you usually post. Give it a try. You usually don't have anything positive or nice to say, but I'm sure with a little humor, you can make your thoughts bearable for the general public.
Harp and harpist survived.
pact of mutual existence.”
Fibrocartilaginous Embolism. In this condition, a small amount of disc material ruptures and gets into one of the blood vessels leading to the spinal cord. As the vessel narrows, the disc material obstructs it, depriving a certain segment of the spinal cord of its blood supply. Without proper blood supply, that segment of the spinal cord dies, resulting in paralysis. Surgery will not help these dogs because there is no pressure on the spinal cord. Often, paralysis involves only one rear leg, or one rear leg is more severely affected than the other. Complete recovery may occur in a few days to weeks, or there may be permanent damage to a portion of the spinal cord. Diagnosis of fibrocartilaginous embolism is based on the correct clinical signs and a normal myelogram. Definitive diagnosis can only be made after death by performing a spinal cord biopsy.
Tryin’ jeans on my ass.
From myriad layers of new leaves
while tiny specs of poems tour the microscopic universe.
In a war that will be won or lost on the battlefield of American resolve, the president has the oratory talent and intelligence to stand among history’s great wartime leaders. If he harnesses his abilities — and gives skilled combat leaders such as Allen the political and logistical support to do what is necessary — we will leave Afghanistan with our heads held high, its people freed of tyranny and the world a safer place.
This was one of the those situations in life one must face with the right attitude. As I mentioned earlier, this was out of family obligation because one person really wanted this to happen. And, someone else loves this person, which was the biggest push for me. I realized that love for multiple people is greater than the hurt and anger I feel for this one person. And, it was that love and desire to please those important people that made me "bigger" and the anger become smaller.
the memories came flooding back, the way memories do............
For Romney.
(I’ve asked this one before, but, well, it’s not like the answers stay the same, and darn it, it’s an interesting question!)
The Terriers hung with the Jayhawks for most of the game as Holland posted 19 points. Though they lost 72-53, they kept the game close for 30 minutes and with 9:32 left, the Terriers trailed by only six points. Though the players take no consolation out of the loss, they are excited for next year and believe that they will make it to the NCAA Tournament again.
The defendant had also challenged the designs on grounds that they were commonplace in the design field in question—thereby contravening section 213(4). The judge first addressed the design field: was it limited to boxes for wraps?
She responded with,
Wait a minute....Atlanta? That's in....Oh, for fuck's sake America! See? This is the problem when you're the most powerful country in the world: all eyes are on you and the only ones who really get mentioned in the international news are the rednecks...the word "justice" cannot be found anywhere in Life's dictionary.
“JVP definitely shares the same beliefs and goals that SJP has, so I think representing Brandeis JVP at the conference is an act of solidarity with SJP’s cause,” Conley said. “I think it’s definitely a really good way to start networking between the two groups.
Just imagine what can happen when that act of connection is shared among so many many….
I could spend more time with the family, but there seems little point. Both my kids are under three, which means they’re unlikely to remember anything I do with them.
My dear friends,I opened my hearth to all of you,if someone knows about a secret to control the emotions i will appreciate this to you....I send you all my love........Josefalaura.
- Victoria (not now, or planning to be in the future, a Mr.)Think I'll hear back?
The English dictionary says that ‘irony’ is a word or term used to say something that isn’t really what was meant. An example of irony is sarcasm, which is a word used to relate to a sharp declaration that means otherwise. Apparently, the phrase “traffic jam when you’re already late” or “a black fly in your Chardonay” isn’t really ironic. Because really, what possible implication and what other sense would a black fly give to an expensive wine other than the fact that it looks incidentally idiotic. In a sense, linguists believe that song has used the word improperly. Alanis Morissette did acknowledge the wrong use of the word ironic but has declared that she had embraced being the queen of malapropism at times especially when she isn’t really paying attention to the technicalities when writing her songs.
“Caesar, you’ve been behaving very strangely lately. For the good of the Empire, you should abdicate and get your head examined by one of those Greek doctors.”
While it is not necessary to serve it in a bread bowl and use the excess bread cubes to dip, it's kind of cool looking and the dip is absolutely addictive when smeared on the bread. If you use the Artisan Bread in Five Minutes a Day method, making the bread bowl is very, very easy. Too easy, in fact. The picture is using the European Peasant Loaf recipe because that is what I had premade in my fridge, but the rye bread recipes are beautiful with this dip. Of course most any cut veggies work very nicely as well.
Email us at :
I believe most marriages have room in where the doors could be opened to better honor the life-long commitment that was made. But the first doors God begins to open are the personal ones, the spouse He wants us to become. To trust God completely in the areas He wants His best light to shine, revealing the work He’s doing within us.
Today I would like to share with you, my application for this year's team - the 2012 Graphic 45 Design Team. Although I am mainly a 'layout' kind of gal, many of the project that I wanted to share on this post are temporarily out for publication. I incorporated a few older projects as well as some mini albums and cards which I feel represent my shabby chic/rustic style.
and I'm the old dog! =) No, really though, I had a big well duh moment today and it was so good, I thought I'd share it. Normally when I return stuff to the store (which I do a lot because I can never make up my mind), I just ask for store credit and consider it free money. So then I'll walk through the store looking for something to buy. 99.9% of the time, it's not something I need, it's just something I decide I want and it's not a smart purchase. The returns are usually to big stores that I go to often to - Target, Walmart, Kohls - so its not like it'll be more than 10 days before I actually do go there for something I atually need.
* Line your tart pan with the dough and put it back in the fridge for at least 1-2 hrs to rest.
These posters act as a public service announcement for colored communities. It’s about respect, human dignity, and the acceptance of other cultures (these posters simply ask people to think before they choose their Halloween costume). Although some Halloween costumes aren’t as racist as the blackface minstrel shows back in the day, they harken to similar prejudices. What these costumes have in common is that they make caricatures out of cultures, and that is simply not okay.
the blink of a blind man’s roving eye
Firstly the packaging. Some people hate this because it's OTT and tacky and quite sickly, however this is basically my style so i really like it. I'm not too keen on the pinky-purple colour and would prefer to see it on a plain bubblegum, neon or magenta pink, however i still think it's very pretty. People have said it looks like the Mac Heatherette packaging or a vibrator, which it does, but i don't care, i still think it's nice and fun and not too similar to the Heatherette packaging to just be a copy. However, perhaps because i'm an artist myself and know lots of other graphic designers, or perhaps just beause i'm being hyper critical, there are lots of small problems that irritate me.
Me: "Sure, what's this regarding?"
It laughed louder and louder again, until the ground was shaking and it felt like the sky itself might tumble down…
P: Painting – something which I never could do in art
Congratulations, please email Caz with your details!
Sister, by Rosamond Upton. A murder mystery- it's really not my fav genre, though I've read a ton this year already. (hey, I'll count this as a "mini-challenge!"). Like Sayers, Upton uses the murder, and the mystery, to talk about a whole lot of other things; bio-chemical medicine and ethics, familial relationships, grief, loss, control, and ultimately love. A beautifully woven story with a surprise ending. So surprising, in fact, that I had to go back and re-work some things in my head- in that way it reminded me of the Dekker's Three ends. The other thing I loved about this book was that it was a series of letters written to the protagonists deceased sister. Grief is clearly a theme here, and Upton writes with tenderness about the unique grief of losing a sibling.
13. Spanky & Our Gang - Stardust
brewers yeast (1 tbsp.)
On my first runthrough of the game I was impossibly relieved when I got given a revolver and six bullets, because it was the solution to my impending starvation. I took it straight to the nearest corner store and swapped it for a bottle of milk and a can of vegetables. The next day food doubled in price.
To help put your mind at ease did you know that Silicones are even used to make the heat resistant tiles on the bottom of space shuttles? If its good enough for stopping spacecraft burning up in our atmosphere, it is good enough for baking a couple muffins!
**For tips on how to not blow what budget you do have at a Homeschooling Convention, see my blog post, The Curriculum Fair .
So this afternoon I was speaking to a dear friend on the phone and wandered outside to let the dog attend to some business . I looked over and the oleander bush i have re-grown from a stump was in beautiful bloom. Huge white flowers all over. It was simply amazing. I said to myself 'i shall try to think a kind thought about frankie joe everytime i see a white oleander flower'. I think that would be nice. I come back inside and try to write a blog entry. I cannot. I google my brother's name, just to see what comes up. A life off the grid is still not invisible, I did find one search record that indicated a man by that name lived in Texas. I smile. I google kabukizero, just because i am a self absorbed attention whore. One of the top five search results is the local Heroin Treatment Facility. I have never even heard of them. I have never been in the same room as heroin. I don't know anyone who used heroin except by departed brother. Was he saying goodbye? There are coincidences in life, and then there are shining examples of what i term 'there is more going on than you will ever know'. You will have to draw your own conclusion, I just smiled and hoped for a better tomorrow.
“AT LAST!” roared the elderly watchman, whirling his cape (purely out of habit – not for any theatrical reason). “You finally realise my intentions – and far too late.” In a flash he had bent down, scooped up hedgehog Kevin into a musty shoebox, and developed a sequel to the Macarena even more catchy than the original routine. “Far too late to save yourselves! HAHAHAHAHA!!” He bent backwards to release an awful laugh (no really, it was so bad) before clutching his lower spine and cringing with pain. “Ah! The lumbago…” he winced.
- he is running like a wild child all over the house
Welcome to Lovecraft
This is telling not showing.
“To my mind, existential boredom is a hotchpotch of a category, and one whose basis is more intellectual than experiential—it is a condition which seems to me to be more read about and discussed than actually experienced. This book will unapologetically give simple boredom an equal billing,” said Prof. Toohey in his preface.
During Barker’s speech, the FFRF leader engaged in a bizarre performance of atheism-fueled songs he‘d like to see performed on children’s television shows. Gaylor, though, delved into some starker, more controversial commentary.
For me, there are four major KEYS to editing a screenplay – whether it’s short or feature-length.
Spring is a time of renewal, which is why I guess, it is very fitting that my sweet, precious, little Amelia Claire is one year old today. She was born on the first day of spring. Her birthday will always be after a long cold winter.
Nomination 1: Cobbetts Real Ale - Dorking
Feldman, 46, is so intimately involved in the funding of the Tory Party that he was present at private dinners in the Downing Street flat when the Prime Minister was entertaining donors.
Musa said the problems in this division first surfaced when the board was performing its functions in the last six to seven months. “We discovered that there were a few questionable positions in relation to the financial status of the company and the application of corporate governance. We then decided to look further and realised that there was cause for curiosity in the energy and utility division,” he said.
A little more than a year ago, the United Nations Children's Fund — the international organization that provides long-term humanitarian and developmental assistance to children and mothers in developing countries — invited Björk to visit the Aceh Province in Indonesia, one of the areas hit hardest by 2004's deadly tsunami. That was because a year earlier, the Icelandic musician released an album of fan-concocted remixes of "Army of Me" (a track from 1995's Post), with all proceeds going to support UNICEF's relief efforts in the storm-struck region.
Both Xunantunich and Cahal Pech provide great examples of what Lower Dover will look like soon enough. All of these Mayan sites had some interaction and contact with the Mayan capital of Tikal through the river systems of the Macal, Mopan, and Belize River. The Mopan and Macal Rivers meet just outside San Ignacio to form the Belize River at “Branch Mouth”. Lower Dover likely played a key role in regulating trade along the Belize River downstream.
Maurice Kirk to be freed on immediate bail pending the dropping of these continued malicious allegations
Where on grass methought I lay.
But what is it that's kept me from spending my boredom and general (as well as quite overwhelming) inclination to sit around for hours on end by writing my caffeinated quirks (and sometimes preaching about coffee and/or other important issues) into the great big void, also known as the blogosphere-hood of the internetz?
Bull & Bush Pub & Brewery Highway To Helles
The three publishing packages on offer are as follows:
Here is how the booth looked on Friday... right before the lovely gentleman who had been the proprietor arrived to start clearing out.
I used one of my 'bleed-through' papers that I cut into tangle tiles a few months back. I love the colors of bleed-throughs, especially this one.
Going nowhere
Readers, now it’s your turn. Ask a question! Leave a comment. Ron will pop back in for one week to respond.
Although David was a very famous advertising pioneer, what many don't know is that he made his fortune in dry cleaning. Being a former chemist, in 1974 he developed a new formula for dry cleaning fluid and sold over 5,000 franchises. He called his stores "Carcinogen Hut." The stores did very well until 1981 when they all mysteriously evaporated.
I told her I did Saturday.
8. Continue to re-connect to the local and Pennsylvania beer community. I got better last year, I'm going to keep it up.
I love spending time with family and friends.
I dug into my healthy stash of Christmas themed papers and embellishments for this one - I love this time of year, because I get to play with all my "stuff"!
8th day - Started good, without Princess wailing, and smooth traffic to work... now at 12.12pm, counting down to lunch hour, and just got a colleague asking where to eat!! LOL!
stroking every fine palace's doorstep,
Here is a short but pretty sweet video I found on youtube to help you get to grips with the basic parts of Reaktor.
So, for quick and easy satisfaction, I’ll leave you with some salt n’ pepper individuals of the eye candy variety, who I managed to forget to add to my original list of favorites.
Two to three million tourists pass through Pompeii every year. It is wonderful that there is such an interest in ancient history, but the sheer volume of people is slowly but surely destroying the remains, especially mosaics and frescoes. After my interview, someone tweeted this: thought your theme park idea interesting on BBCr4today - but would people visit theme-park and abandon Pompeii? My answer was: Yes! Only the keenest would visit the real Pompeii & it would ease wear & tear. By making our "Living Pompeii" more attractive to young, fun-loving and casual tourists it would make space in the real ruins for scholars, students and super keen tourists. They could in theory visit one or the other, or both.
For example, if you grow strawberries, alternate them with a row of marigolds, they will taste even better!
She did not offer details, but US officials have noted that Chinese firms have been stepping in to fill the void left by companies leaving Iran because of UN and US sanctions.
That you will always own a piece of my soul.
And it has been a few weeks since I've danced; things are slow around town for the summer. And this is my first dance of the evening... All in all, I'm just not sure I'm going to be dancing my best right now.
So, what do we have to look forward to for the second half of the meet?
Flamane walked quietly towards the monk.
Call it a kindler, gentler version of oversigning since these student-athletes will have degrees and the opportunity to play somewhere else. Call it a retention non-crisis since they will have earned full APR points by graduating and improve the APR scores of the new school as well.
1/3 cup butter, melted and cooled
I’d asked for this during my first visit a week or so back, but they were out of it at the time. Seems this one must be their most popular product. I got lucky today and it’s telling that Perry remembered that I’d asked for this one originally because he specifically asked me if I wanted to try it (see if that ever happens at a big chain pub or brewery). This pale ale pours with a quick head and very little beading. The taste is both bitter hoppy and sweet, which must hint at some sort of careful balance that my uninitiated palate is incapable of picking up. It’s also vaguely nutty with low carbonation. Bottom line: Peg Leg Pale Ale is a good one and a decent example of the style.
The number 17 is associated with bad luck in Italy because the Roman Numerals XVII are an anagram of the Latin word VIXI – ‘I Was Alive’ note the past tense! It can be used in the sense of saying “My life is over”
It seems Mme. Demure herself has been revealed for the kinky little minx we all knew was in there lurking. On the distinguished talk show "EuroTrash", (btw, not at ALL the type of place where you'd expect these kinds of shenanigans), she was giving a quick review of two books about how to make international lovin'. The books taught said reader how to say several phrases, such as:
The Rogue's Princess follows the adventures of Mercy Hart, the daughter of a rich London merchant, and a man who strictly follows the new Puritan religion to the letter. With such a strong religious background, it's difficult for Mercy's father, and Mercy herself, to accept her romance with Kit Turner, an actor and illegitimate relation to the Lacey family. Though she has fallen desperately in love with Kit, it goes against everything Mercy has been raised to believe.
This machine is smack dab in the middle of a very busy and very ghetto laundromat, so it is rife with annoying distractions, most notably the ever present crackheads/schizophrenics who hang out in there, sit by the door and yell at everyone for hours. In addition, you got screaming kids, mad mommas, and occasionally hot babes who are distracting in a totally different way.
I am scared that if I don't get out of this fog that this is the person the kids are going to know. Not the old me, the happy, go lucky me. They are only going to know the stressed me. The one who starts to stress with just the thought of going to the grocery store with the kids. The one who is uptight. Who is watching everything the boys do when we are going out, expecting the worse. I know I'm not the only mom of a special needs child to do this.
I’ve fancied trying to make one of these for a while. I’ve seen a couple of commercial products, usually quite expensive and wondered if it would make life easier when sorting out my rear quarter. So I used some old 3mm wall tube and some inch square box to make a frame. Again I used TubeMitre to form the pipe joints and because I have no access to a lathe to turn anything I had to use ground down washers to keep the ends concentric.
16If the agreement of the Lord your God, which was given to you by his orders, is broken, and you become the servants of other gods and give them worship, then the wrath of the Lord will be burning against you, and you will quickly be cut off from the good land which he has given you.
I recommend this book to all the people who have ever been a victim of bullying or abuse and to everyone that loves a good story! I am so impressed, I will definitely be recommending this to all my friends!
He was in the Army for 4 years and 22 days. He was overseas for 8 months and 3 days.
"How much 'almost more time' will it take you?"
If you’re searching for a cotton, light and airy, summer time dress to create you appear hot but not overdoing it at outside parties like a vacation holiday or an upcoming barbeque celebration, you then can go to get a halter neck style or perhaps a maxi dress.
“Van Petten, founder of the popular Web site RadicalParenting.com, offers parents a candid view of the contemporary teen’s world in this eye-opening text. Van Petten uses actual stories about teens and their often anxious, angry, or befuddled parents to introduce each chapter. Pointing out that she is neither a parent nor a teen (nor a doctor, therapist, or counselor), the college-grad author has nevertheless earnestly investigated her subject and includes current research on teens as well as hundreds of “real quotes, interviews, e-mails and advice from actual teens.” Van Petten explores a variety of timely subjects, including peer relationships, teen/parent communication, bullying, technology, and “risky business” (smoking, drinking, sex, and more). Her outlook on technology and “Internet savvy” is particularly incisive, emphasizing not only the hazards of “time-suck” activities (i.e., Facebook, chatting on IM, and texting) but also the many social and academic benefits of the digital universe. Like a crafty spy, Van Petten comfortably segues from parent to teen perspective, and while noting that each adolescent is unique, she skillfully opens doors to the collective teen psyche. “
The 36-year-old point guard, who had a short spell in the Turkish league in 2010 after his return to Philadelphia turned sour, last month filed documents to dismiss his long-running divorce case.
New on our website is a Gallery of images taken on the 12″ LX200-ACF Meade Telescope. We have images of planets, nebulae and a globular cluster. Tell us which one is your favourite and why! There are more coming of the Moon, Mars, a galaxy… We look forward to seeing what our students come up with.
Put the chillies into a bowl and cover with boiling water - soak until soft about 15-30 minutes. Take out the softened chillies but keep the water. Remove the stems and seeds and roughly chop - place the chilli pieces into a processor or blender. Add in the onion, garlic, fresh chilli, paprika, drained tomatoes and half a cup of soaking water. Process to form a smooth paste.
I’m constantly having conversations either in person or online about how to stay motivated to write. A novel, is a huge undertaking, and while I can say I did get the first draft done in that week I had off – I’m still writing and re-writing bits and pieces of it.
Instead I said, “YYYYYYYYYYYYYYYEEEEEEAGGH!!! Fucking shit yeah!”
By the time I was ready to hit the Pandazilla, Justin had a certain trick up his sleeve he was ready to show me. This was a cocktail he had invented involving Pandazilla, stag cherry bourbon, illy coffee liquor and ice.
ALIEN ABDUCTIONS MAY BE FROM “PLFs” OWNED BY THE CABAL
If Behold A Pale Horse has been all but forgotten today, it’s easy to see why. Shortly before his death in 1997, Fred Zinnemann admitted, “The film didn’t really come together… it was interesting, but it did not really feel right except in a few spots.” Zinnemann may have been ruminating over the film’s disappointing finale, in which Peck—portraying an aging Spanish assassin—walks out to San Martin for a final showdown with Anthony Quinn, who plays a military police captain. We expect Peck to kill Quinn at the end. Instead, Peck wastes his ammo on a former friend—a “traitor”—and dies in a hail of bullets, while Quinn walks off scot-free.
Straight from the board of directors in my head, I am about to share. At times it will be too much, but never too little. Open your mind, heart and imagination: Welcome to my Life – Unscripted, Unrehearsed, Unadulterated.
Coordination and Management of Outside Counsel
I am married but without children. We have been practicing CDD for about a year now. We are still feeling out the waters. I came to my husband with this. He thought I was nuts. Now I think he may be starting to see the benefits of it. I am a fairly headstrong woman who can be independent if needed and needy when not necessarily wanted, so it gets complicated. My husband spanks me for discipline, fun and maintenance. I asked him for this. It's what I felt I needed to get some balance within myself. I've found it can help mentally as well, if not better than taking pills. The balance in the brain I believe to be very real when a spanking occurs. It's a strange phenomenon. Discipline for me is pretty non-existent although it hangs over my head. Majority of the time my husband says I'm too good for that. Although, he will tell everyone I'm nothing but bad! ; ) Now know this, he doesn't expect as much out of me daily as a lot HoHs. I do respect my husband. He likes to banter with me. It's one of the things that attracted me to him. However, I have in the past bantered to a point of being disrespectful. Well, that level of bantering or disrespect can't happen now. Generally though, my husband spanks for maintenance or fun. He has now gotten over his fears of spanking me. Now, he likes it! Maintenacne for me is a lot about attitude adjustment, mood levels or the fact that I may be teetering on the edge of being mischievious. Hee hee. He doesn't use other forms of discipline or punishment, although he's threatened to take away my computer.
Now I can’t take credit here.
and made the following purchases:
I went and listened to more of this band and I have to say that I have not yet thanked the little golden apple for turning me on to this band. And now, it's playing at our Sugar & Spice store.
#67. morning walks with mom
I dare not speak or move;
Or take Kelly Kelly for example, who after wrestling in the WWE for going on six years now (starting from her ECW stint in Extreme Exposé) still can tell the difference between a wristlock and a shoelace.
I am super happy with the new splash of color and even happier that it's a change. After 5 years you start to hate things you may have once loved.
“Showing one nonsense after another is not art! Filmmakers who insult our history must learn we are not accepting these bullshits quietly!”
It’s tearing your hair out at quarter past nine when he’s emerged from his bedroom for the sixteenth time that evening and all you can do is keep sending him back because, at this point in your life, you don’t know what else to do. It’s glaring at the giggling face and knowing that this has now become a confrontation between the two of you. It’s putting the rope across the door to keep him inside – an old and well-established trick – and listening to him scream. It’s smacking him because nothing else seems to get to him, and then backing off the instant you realise you’re doing it in anger, and not because it was the most effective discipline method. It’s slumping down outside the bedroom door, defeated, or cradling him in your arms as you rock him to sleep.
20 pounds in 7 weeks. That is how much weight I've lost thanks to changing my eating habits, Body by Vi and ZUMBA Fitness.
How not to look at changing rosters
We'll stay with the old man wherever he wants to stay
It's quite possible that this post will be adding insult to the injury being suffered by my poor, neglected blog, as I venture into the cheap world of beer that is Oettinger. Apparently nobody in Oettingen actually drinks it as they send it all away, but then the local beer snobs (probably Becks drinkers, hah! :P) would say that.
12. "Skinhead Moonstomp" by Simaryp.
With crowds growing, protesters flocked to Bryant Park to march to Union Square. Tom Morello, from rock band Rage Against the Machine, led a ‘Guitarmy’ Guitar Workshop beforehand.
Meanwhile property powerhouse and NAMA panel valuer, CB Richard Ellis (CBRE) has issued a downbeat note on activity in the first quarter of 2011, saying that there were only two investment property transactions (really three because Google made two purchases). This, according to the note “follows a year in which 29 transactions with a combined value of almost €242 million were completed in the Irish market”. What the CBRE note doesn’t tell you is that the combined value of the three transactions mentioned for quarter one was over €210m (Google’s purchase of Gasworks House for “slightly over €100m” and Gordon House for €99.9m, both in Barrow Street and the sale and leaseback of Ericsson House, Clonskeagh, €10m). So on the face of it, the first quarter of 2011 has seen sales worth 87% of the total sales for all of 2010. Wow! Also I can’t seem to find any reference in the CBRE note to the purchase of 22-25 Clare Street by the Office of Public Works in February 2011 for €5.65m. Now I am being slightly mischievous because CBRE want to highlight the collapse in transaction volume but the fact remains that transaction value is considerably up on last year.
Indeed, for too long we’ve thrown this ridiculous “money” at the problem of “poverty” and “we” know now that more than “aid dollars” are needed. Such as the aforementioned pink cheetah print bras.
As you were....
‘Where is she?’
So that’s what we did and now it’s over to you, and if you get a sec, don’t forget to check out our individual blogs and see what else we have been up to.
I'm underwhelmed by what I've achieved so far. I read the Forbes Report on 30 under 30 in the various categories (this was my last year... since I turn 30 next year), and I'm like.... this (my life) is going TERRIBLY. Yes, I'm slightly bitter.
I'm not a book snob, God, I hate book snobs, but I only really read these authors whilst on holiday, and even then I must admit I spend more time wondering how Dan Brown gets away with it, damn him and his many, many millions of dollars!!
We are beyond excited today because a whole slew of brand new This Thing Called Family products are now available for Spring! These messages are especially dear to our heart and we are in love with these new colors and how useful these pieces are. We hope you find something that you like!
t-h-t! of the rifle-balls,
This is Book One of the Mindjack Trilogy, and I'm eager for more.
Any lie that republican leadership is willing to throw out there,… they have a solid group of liberal hating anti-Obama crazies that are there to suck it up and shout it out as true.
@ 3:30pm
I joined Meg for this as I find haggis to be quite vile, and the veggie option I’ve not been able to face since we bought about 20 of them in the reduced-to-clear section of the supermarket one year and effectively OD’d on them in the weeks following.
John Obi Mikel was lucky to escape a red shortly after the restart after he caught Cheik Tiote with an elbow in an aerial challenge that left the Newcastle man needing lengthy treatment before he was stretchered off.
The hours rolled by slowly. Mile after mile, the scenery stayed exactly the same; dust, rocks, and sun. Death had swept across the land and consumed everything, but they were still here, still alive, lost, but still moving on. Maybe someday things would change, but for now, all they can do is move on. Rel rested his arm against the door, and his head against his palm.
Here are some reviews from bloggers so far on 22/1163:
- We do NOT post News, Tour dates, Single tracks, music videos only etc unless they come with a full album stream.
"It shows we have a functioning electoral system, and that we're going into the normal pre-election cycle of the ANC whipping up some anti-white sentiment to distract the masses from their current anti-black sentiment."
so, i tried to not freak out about bugs when bella could see me. it was hard at first. my instincts want to scream or cry. i start to shake, sometimes violently. but, especially lately, i have been trying really hard to hold it together.
It’s the little things that have got to come together to form the bigger picture? Don’t get me wrong, life’s a big thing - a quite big deal in fact, but it’s made of little things - little things that make everyday worthwhile? And some of those little things are held within the eyes and words of people everywhere.
5. For the Ganache: Chop the chocolate and transfer it to a heatproof bowl. Heat the cream until simmering and pour it over the chocolate. Let it sit for one minute and then stir until smooth. (If this has not completely melted the chocolate, you can return it to a double-boiler to melt what remains or 20 seconds in the microwave will also work.) Add the butter and stir until combined. Let the ganache cool until thick but still soft enough to be piped.
There is no charge or insinuation that any of the Executive Orders which we are now holding to be invalid were issued from the ulterior motives or to further and favor the political interest of the President issuing them. It is admitted in the majority opinion that Executive Order No. 62, seeking to regulate house and lot rentals was issued in good faith by President Roxas. Executive Order No. 192 was issued to regulate exports, President Quirino presumably believing that exports at this time still needed regulation and control as was formerly provided by Congress in its Act No. 728, and that the matter was still within the field of his emergency powers as was also mistakenly believed by President Roxas in issuing Executive Order No. 52. As to Executive Order No. 226, it merely appropriated funds to defray the expenses in connection with the holding of the national elections in November, 1949, without which, said election could not be held. With respect to Executive Order No. 225, it merely continues in force Republic Act 320 which appropriated funds for the last fiscal year inasmuch as Congress had failed to pass a General Appropriation Act for the operation of the National Government for the period beginning July 1, 1949 to June 30, 1950. There is no insinuation that any political motives or purposes are involved in these Executive Orders.
As for cleansing, they're great! They remove my makeup just as well as the Off Your Face wipes (did I review those yet? No? Oops... coming soon!) and leave my skin feeling really soft and smooth. I get dry skin on my forehead actually, and these have really helped on the days where I don't exfoliate! With Off Your Face wipes I find they're quite moist - sometimes a little TOO moist. These are just right! And of course they come in a BRIGHT PINK packet - it goes perfectly with all the other S&G things in my bathroom...
Part of me was thinking I should probably thump him on the head. Launch myself into a lecture about sacred space and reverence.
WHOOOOOOOOOOOOOOSHHHHHHHHHHH!!!!
It's that day again. The anniversary of the death of our beloved mother, grandmother, mother in law.
Doesn't want voters to realize that the lower taxes of the last ten years haven't created jobs. YES
Poor Flo is the only one serving these impatient arseholes, who are tighter with their tips than Scrooge during a recession and her main reward for earning any money is the opportunity to add more tables to the diner - thus increasing her never ending cycle of dystopian servitude. Show this game to a Communist and he'll be hurling his copy of the Manifesto straight at the TV.
the deeper my awe at God's infinite love......
Our Constitution holds dear that all persons are equal before the law and are entitled to equal protection of the law without discrimination on the basis of race and religion. One crucial factor that divides the people and can cause disunity is their economic status. If there is a wide economic gap among races in the country there is bound to be dissatisfaction and animosity. The deprived can be people of any ethnic group – Malay, Chinese, Indian or the Indigenous – and a government that does not address this problem is bound to cause widespread racial disunity.
35 lbs (51.00%)
It’s not some special way you walk
This happened a while ago, but I’m a pretty mediocre blogger, I apologize.
Dubbel- served w/ Mushroom cap stuffed with mozzarella, pepperoni, and bread crumbs
- Inigo Montoya
Thanks for visitng the Cheery Lynn Blog today! Be sure to check our blogs for inspiration and fun challenges, sure to inspire you to create everyday!!
In the Spring, there are vampires in the wind.
This dry rub is an adaptation of Joy of Cooking's Southern Barbecue Dry-Rub recipe. I didn't have all the spices at hand when I tried it the first time, but it turned out really well. I made a few changes the second time around and the ribs tasted even better. So here's my version:
I use Not Your Mother's-All Eyes On Me Shape & Shine Hairspray as a finishing spray. Whether my "do" is curly, wavy, straight, or up in a formal "do". I love that this hairspray locks humidity out while holding my hair style in through out the day.
I had been working with a little stallion for over 12 months.
They used as their model the very vital Chicago Irish-American Heritage Center once also a cavernous school building.
Hearing this let me know that my opening hook does indeed do it’s job. Which I’ve worked hard to achieve.
there are times i feel adrift - floating along like this lone little dogwood. and when i do, i go back to the touchstones of my life - my family, my friends, my job. it is good to feel connected. and in some ways, i think that blogging also provides a tether to the world. we gather around this mutual campfire - warming our hands and our souls. we circle the wagons up - keeping out the wolves, coyotes and other predators that seek to tear us down. we pioneers and adventurers.
Make.my.day.
Besides my eventful run I decided at 9:30 pm that I needed to re-organize the entire kitchen. Yes, I willingly admit I have an OCD issue and sometimes it kicks in at the strangest hours. So there I was matching lids to tupperware containers, if they didn't have a lid they got tossed, if they didn't have a matching bowl they were tossed. I cannot believe how many un-matching buddies lived in my house until I went to sort everyone out! Needless to say, they all got put back into their spots, squares in one drawer, rounds in another. Then I went on to clean out the other cupboards only to find a jar of peanut butter that expired in 2008! I can't believe that Trav has never cleaned out those cupboards, better yet, that I haven't gotten a hold of them and cleaned them out myself!
I told The Blonde about my fishy tale over breakfast….
TUNE IN BETWEEN 5pm and 6.30pm to THE MIXED BAG on 93.9 DUBLIN SOUTH FM
proof of the criminality inherent in the U.S. judicial system. What
Thursday I worked all day, with barely ten minutes for writing at lunchtime. Then I went to the meet and met (dun-dun-dun) my nemesis. Sometime during Wednesday, I'd started pacing myself by a user on the Liverpool forum who had always been just slightly ahead of me. This person was at the write-in, at which she managed to write about three times as much as me (I got too distracted talking to people), but let's just say there was some smack-talking, everlasting enmity was declared, and on Friday we went mad.
Doom and gloomers, nay sayers, and hand-wringers may firmly grasp the present but they seldom create desired outcomes. 20% of leadership is seeing the downward drift. 80% of leadership is firing the burners.
That said, I still think the WubbaNub is a cute little item, especially cute for a baby shower gift or just as a splurge. If you would like to purchase one for your own little blessing or to give as a baby shower gift head on over to the WubbaNub Website to search for a place to buy one. Of course, as a part of my Baby Shower Celebration you have the chance to win a WubbaNub of your very own. Just fill in the Rafflecopter form below and remember, you don't have to fill in every entry, but the more you fill out the better your chances are of winning.
Video: Hardly unarmed civilians, or “lightly armed freedom fighters,” meet Syria’s tank-driving, rocket-firing, Kalashnikov-waving foreign-funded rebels, many of whom are not even Syrian.
Thanks to all who participated in our Marker It Up Challenge. We will be back tomorrow with a brand new challenge...can you believe we are up to #61 already? Crazy... :) See you in the morning along with our Guest Designer Christy, what an exciting day!
I know of someone else who married well and likes to place a price tag/ a reference to a tangible amount on everything she talks about: how many square feet her home is, the value of her home, the cost of the ring she recently bought. It so detracts from a conversation because it becomes superficial when all one does is affix $$$$$ signs to words.
Mayhaps you will recognize the all too familiar logo's from my Motherships. Target Boutique and Starbucks.
Would you like some stew?
this has been one of the most mild winters i can remember.
I found this recipe and tweaked it a bit...and let me just say, these don't taste too healthy....and they pair perfectly with my lighter salisbury steaks...add some corn and you have a tv dinner with flavor and minus the burnt brownie with paper-like sprinkles.
And thirdly, I'm quite gladly staying at HOME on this NYE's night! I'm thrilled to be at home with my boys and I am so looking forward to ringing in the new year with my true loves and waking up in the morning without a hangover.
You're in for a treat today. A family favorite that is simple yet hearty. Great for a Tuesday night family dinner or a Saturday night dinner party. But either way, you throw it in the crock pot in the morning and forget about it. Half an hour before dinner, add in the last ingredients and enjoy.
Lean Beef Cuts (there are 29 of them on www.beefwhatsfordinner.com)
Pratyush tries to help Mahek taking out her luggage.
(I believe that blacks account for 43% of the population of Cincinnati, - No:8 on the list - but could not find a reliable source for that figure)
T.K. Ramamoorthy - Natta
leads himself this time with brandish’d sword,)
Lauren says, "My favorite thing about digital stamps is that after you've settled on a design you can effortlessly make as many cards as you'd like! I used the Christmas Ornaments set to create a template for a set of adorable 4" round ornament-shaped cards that will go to my nieces and nephews this December. I used a coordinating paper pad to mix-n-match patterns in order to make cards that were very similar... but each unique! The "real" hanging wires and bead details make them just a little bit more special."
4. The Problem: They Seem Bored
To celebrate all the exciting goings on we would like to offer a 10% discount code for our challenge followers! For the fortnight that this challenge runs use the code YELLOW to receive 10% discount on website purchases! This code will be valid until 13th May 2012.
Got that? The car parks ITSELF! This was a big thing for about twenty three minutes a few years back, and it’s really just a drop in the bucket of things that frighten me. All the futuristic thriller sci-fi movies show robots taking over the planet. The AI gets too smart and they snap and kill us all. I’m pretty sure at the start of those movies, cars are parking themselves. At least we don’t have robots that clean up after us!
Help me today
*White vinegar is ideal, but you can definitively use cider vinegar if you wish (just keep in mind that it is a bit more expensive). Cider Vinegar is more likely to be organically produced, which is better for the environment.
salt - to taste
Several of these rooms were still an issue when I got pregnant, and one of my goals during the pregnancy was to resolve these things, and I was pretty darn successful. I cleaned and organized every room in the house, save one bedroom upstairs. Part of the reason I was able to clean was that anything I wasn't sure what to do with (or was part of a serious organizational process), I stuck in this one bedroom. This enabled me to stay focused and clean the rest of the rooms.
There are plenty of sophisticated ideas out there: end corporate personhood; institute a “Tobin Tax” on stock purchases and currency trading; nationalise banks; socialise medicine; fully fund government jobs and genuine Keynesian stimulus; lift restrictions on labour organising; allow cities to turn foreclosed homes into public housing; build a green energy infrastructure.
They stared some more.
Single crochet together/decrease (sc2tog)
After reading more than a handful of books by American authors and a couple from African American authors I was craving a shift. I searched “latino authors” on Google and Alvarez’s name popped up. I felt guilty for not remembering how blessed I felt when I came across her in the books I mentioned. I pre ordered A Wedding in Haiti and was anticipating getting my e-mail to let me know it was ready.
But, I am excited about watching it. Have you ever watched someone down a tree? It's SO THRILLING to watch. I'll see if I can find my video camera, and take a movie. What a funny way to be spending my birthday. You can tell I'm a loggers daughter - LMBO!!!
When his case was put to Illiza, the deputy mayor responded: “He’s part of the punk community and whoever was caught has to go through our reeducation so they wake up.”
As I’ve mentioned previously, multiple indicators are suggesting that the correction is about to end; with one important proviso. That being that we are still enjoying a bull market. It is never easy to find market tops since they are marked by a slow degradation of momentum rather than the fearful spikes of selling we see in important bottoms. However, aside from the weakness in the cumulative advance decline lines, I haven’t seen any strong indications that the bull market has ended.
Josephine- I finally caught up on the posts at freedigital stamps ad saw you reference me...lol here is your song!!!!
What the hell does a Wiccan have to do to become a damn chaplain in this country? Why the hell does seminary cost so damn much when ministers don’t make much in the first place?
She seemed tired in the movie. I really related to her & felt for her character in particular. I’ll try to find her picture to post so you can see how right now she & I resemble one another, but I don’t have tusks… Other than that, we are TWINS… See?
No, no, no, I don't need another place, for always being on top of things. Everybody knows that it's a sham, it's a sham.
That’s the Prime Minister of Norway!
However, the integrated power of what Berardi calls "semiocapitalism", structured by the global reach of digital communication networks, has eroded those mental and geographical boundaries which the under-pressure worker/jobseeker/student/consumer would previously have fought to maintain. The duties of alienated labour are now diffused into every corner of life. Under such conditions it is increasingly difficult to impose temporal or spatial limits on work which is as mobile and insidious as its sources and products are seemingly ungraspable. "Both simple executing workers and entrepreneurial managers share the vivid perception that they depend on a constant flow that cannot be interrupted and from which they cannot step back save at the price of being marginalized."
This also made me wonder what kind of tweets other companies got. I searched for Coke by Coca Cola and got mostly good things about the product. Even found good things about Tiffany & Co. So why is it that when I searched for Kia or as mentioned above Vera Bradley I found plenty of negative things? And how much influence do these tweets have on the company’s products? That’s the next thing I’m on a mission to find out…
shaped bits from the original suit cutting layout. Now, a pencil skirt would be easy enough to squeeze out of the small amount of fabric, but I already have one from the first project, and the fabric weight is really not suitable for anything but a skirt or a pair of pants.
Did I do something crazy?
This fine looking young lady just happens to be my Mother whose 90th birthday we celebrated this week. A couple of summers ago while she was visiting, my neighbor Chris knocked on the side door and of all things he had a starling perched on his shoulder. The bird was completely sociable and took to my Moms shoulder comfortably for a meet and greet. Our little friend seemed healthy and flew off into the trees to wait for us if we went into the house and was eager to resume our inter-species dialog when we reemerged. He was our constant companion and shared in all manor of human activities from carpentry to gardening showing no fear of the noise or fuss. Why did this bird crave our attention?
Amanpour: Today we have the most brilliant
How about you.... who are your heros or heroines????
* The Consumer Price Index (CPI) is expected to rise by 0.3% in March, down from a 0.5% January rise. Inflation has been very tame over the last year. Most of the rise is expected to come from the volatile food and energy components of the index. Stripping them out to get to the core CPI, the increase is expected to be only 0.2%, matching a 0.2% rise in January. Rent and Owners Equivalent Rent together make up over 30% of the overall CPI and more than 40% of core CPI and are likely to be either unchanged or up just 0.1% as they have been for the last year or so, thus keeping the overall increase in inflation very low. Inflation, particularly core inflation, is not a significant economic problem at this point. Efforts to combat it aggressively are misguided, since those measures will tend to make real economic problems, like unemployment, much worse.
Anyway, this works out to a “wage” of $73.73/hr as a couple or $36.86/hr per person.
~I have been trying my hand at making sourdough bread again. It was years ago when I last tried it and I am having fun. We have had some really yummy successes and one not so great batch. It is always fun to figure out one more thing (yeast in this case) that we can do without.
I don't know how to say this so you can see me swoon. The periwinkles were something new to me and now they go on my list of new obsessions. Right up there with the Geoduck. They look like snail but taste like clam. They were hard to pick out of the shell but I would have smashed that shell to get to the morsel. Oh wait, I did. I wanted to steal the little fork thingys that were given to get the perwinkle out of the shell. It was a silver pig pick. No, picture and I couldn't draw it but WAIT! I stole a shell to show you. See what I risk to share with you all? I could have gotten in trouble from Hank or the chefs for this.
At 21 I was insecure and spent way too much time focusing on my visible flaws. I was careful not to offend anyone with my opinions and often held back my enthusiasm. Now, 19 years later I’ve slowly created my authentic self. Now, my enthusiasm shows in everything I do. Being who I have always been rather than going through my life pursuing an idea of the person I thought I was supposed to be is a far better way to live. I accept my flaws both intrinsic and extrinsic. I genuinely like myself and that is a world away from the girl I was at 21. -
However, I did find this useful piece of documentary material, which does rather suggest that women, as a species, have contradictory views on the subject...
Remember too that there are other wine districts on the extremeties of Burgundy, Irancy, St Bris – this village applellation makes only white wines made from Sauvignon Blanc, as well as a host of areas that produce wines labelled up as Bourgogne made more specific by the name of their area or village, I have especially enjoyed some Bourgogne Côte d’Auxerre as well as excellent examples from the higher land, west of the Côte de Nuits and the Côtes de Beaune – the Bourgogne Hautes Côtes de Nuits and Bourgogne Hautes Côtes de Beaune.
But I know Hip Hop’s dying so why don’t you begin to fade
Ware had two projects in progress at Motown during this period. He was producing songs for T-Boy Ross, and he was recording his own solo album. But when label president Berry Gordy heard one of the proposed Ross tracks, "I Want You," he decided that Marvin Gaye should cut it instead. And when Gaye heard the material Ware had done for his album, it was turned into a Gaye LP instead. Ware produced what now became Gaye's I Want You album, released on Tamla in March 1976, having co-written all the songs on it. The title tune (co-written with Ross) topped the R&B charts and made the Top 20 of the pop charts. It went on to become a standard, covered by Herb Alpert, Gato Barbieri, Madonna, and Michael McDonald among many others. Robert Palmer's medley of it with "Mercy Mercy Me (The Ecology)," another Gaye hit, reached the pop Top 20 in 1991. The I Want You album went to number one on the R&B charts and the Top Ten of the pop charts. It spun off a second single, "After the Dance," co-written by Ware, Ross, and Gaye, that made the R&B Top 20 and was a pop chart entry.
Delaney said she was simply recording life as she saw it in the teeming urban environment in which she grew up. “For a writer, a place like Salford is worth its weight in gold, I think it’s a fabulous place, and the language is alive. It’s virile. It lives and it breathes and you know exactly where it’s coming from, right out of the earth … The North Country people usually are shown as gormless and not as they are. For in actual fact they
We spent an afternoon at the Fair last month. I didn't get a lot of pictures, but we did see a lot.
Because the sauce was so thick and rich, I decided to give it a larger surface to stick to. I went with a wide egg noodle instead of spaghetti. The big noodles provided more surface area to accommodate the hearty sauce...
its best when its effortless.
In the meantime Charlie and Sam escape, and she finally reveals to Charlie her hidden crush. The two start making out. It’s quickly turning into the best birthday party Charlie has ever had and then…and then something goes horribly wrong. Sam pulls away to find Charlie non-responsive. That’s when she notices the large hole in his head with blood gushing out. Charlie’s been killed by a stray bullet.
She reportedly told the deputy she had drunk three or four beers.
So while it seems a ways away now (what with oral surgery and spring break intervening!), I had a BLAST at I-CON last weekend.
Reading stories about how others have benefited from blood donation, and stories from donors about why they believe in donating blood, is both humbling and inspiring.
In the past, I’ve thought that Antinous would have been quite similar to Mabon and Cú Chulainn in the Insular Celtic world; a Native American I spoke with many years back said that Antinous seemed to him like a form of Coyote; Germanic practitioners have suggested similarities to Freyr and Baldr; many things about the mythology of Sarutahiko-no-Okami in Shinto–including details of the history of his principal shrine and his own death by drowning–also echo Antinous quite strongly; Shiva, Skanda, and Hanuman all have certain things in common with Antinous; and so on and so forth through cultures and pantheons about which we can only guess at this point. While Antinous may never assume their forms or their guises–nor they his–there is utterly no reason why he can’t at least be friends with any of these deities. If there is one thing I have observed in my interactions over the years with Antinous, it’s that he’s never yet demonstrated any hostility toward or difficulties with any other deity, spirit, hero, divine figure, pantheon, or even individual practitioners. People’s relationships with him may change, or their interests in him (or his in them, in some cases) may waver; but, no outright rejections or refusals of hospitality or friendliness have occurred about which I’m aware. And I think it will continue to work in this way for the foreseeable future.
I'll coil around that lump of clay.
Open any book on marriage (and this is a slight exaggeration as I have not read every book on marriage), and you will find that women want to be loved and men want to be respected. That women long for intimacy and men long for sex, and to a degree this is true. However, while the trappings might be different, the underlying desires are the same. All of us want to be loved well, treated well, to know that we are important to the ones that we love, and so few of us are willing to actually give that in return. No two people will receive these feelings in quite the same way, but everyone wants to feel them. By this I mean that we all recognize love in different forms: one man wants to be told that he is worthy, skilled, and important; another cares nothing for words, but wants to be served; another is happy to take care of himself, but treasures tokens of affection; and another recognizes love through physical intimacy (the book The Five Love Languages covers this well, and I suggest everyone read it).
So there it is the top 10... Hey its ok, there is always next year. ;)
I had judges who scored me as low as they could without going into negative numbers, all without comments. I had a judge who told me she’d be okay if my heroine died. I’ll admit, that one made me cry—a lot. But then I had a handful of judges who gave me okay scores, but what I loved is that they gave me a goldmine in comments.
Are you having a wonderful start to your fall or spring?
Mr Andoh’s Pennine Diary is the story of Koichi Andoh, a man in his mid 20s, who set off in November 1934, from his home port of Nagoya on board an NYK Line steamer called the Hakusan Maru.
It's not the clothes, the makeup, or the leaning that's unlawful, although you'd think it was judging by the way the some of the authorities behave. No, it's what happens after the skimpily attired citizens get in the vehicles they were leaning on that has everyone's panties embarking on one pickle of a misadventure. You see, there's a certain segment of the population that need to expel seminal fluid in the presence of another human being, and that's where the sex trade worker comes in.
But I’m playing Kanga and this is my Roo
Again do they really think that firing 400,000 teachers and as many other firefighters and social service workers plus taking away money for food stamps, transportation or medical care will help the business were these persons shop?
On an unrelated matter, i'd better get down and chivvy up the people who've foolishly joined today's Landscape Encounter Group. We're going to get them to clear out all the leaves that have washed into the drain on the drive. Blooming nuisance, but thankfully it only happens at times of heavy or moderate rain.
However, the BBC recently reported that “e-mails, which appear to show that Mr Coulson authorised the payments, have been passed to the police”.
A few times only, at the beginning
Archery – All zones: Sept. 15-Feb. 28, 2013.
STEVE BUSCEMI / Enoch “Nucky” Thomson – “BOARDWALK EMPIRE” (HBO)
This will most definitely take a few different posts so stay tuned for the actual reviews, but here is a little sneak preview of what is to come;) I wish I could be like Oprah and give these all away to my readers. Now THAT would be awesome!
Beer Geek Bacon offers up dark chocolate and espresso in a thick oozy concoction the viscosity of motor oil. Just gorgeous.
4. on one side stamped the regal rose using your stamp pad, cover the side of the baggie
Holy is love
I feel the past fall with deepening moans.
1.Loneliness
But yesterday along came a great big BUT. Like a freight train careering its way right through my brain. What would happen if I explored the grey area, let go a little of the A and B, let go of the idea that there has to be a positive to match the negative, a right and wrong. Maybe I should just let there be an ‘is’.
“Higher” is an absorbing read – meticulously researched and hard to put down. It goes into detail about how the Empire State Building was built – it “went up like a rocket ship” in under 14 months, and the statistics surrounding its construction are jaw-dropping: Over 3,400 workers clocked in daily. An average of 10,000 tons of steel erected each month. 500 truckloads of material delivered every day – that’s 1 truck a minute. 10 million bricks were laid. 6,500 windows were installed.
I'm sure I'm going to have to be taking a lot of breaks with Mr. Mooney in the truck, but by my next post, I should have the trip planned out.
1 can Comstock peach pie filling
The officer barely listened as his flashlight filled up the backseat.
One of the people depicted in the painting is Jacob Patchen, who Brooklyn Before Now has written about before. You can read all about him here. He was a grumpy (to say the least) man who was opposed to virtually all forms of progress in the village of Brooklyn. Most likely, Anne Eliza and her mother would have known him or at least known who he was.
So if you want more lore, tell me. If you want more outfits, say so. If you want me to finish some of the half-written stories I have sitting in drafts, click away!
Let's find out who it is...
Pages: 476
Adding a photo or pattern background to your blogger template
1 collaboration
All of the pieces are inked. Plus I added white dots, black dots, and Diamond Stickles. There was quite a bit of layering on this layout, but I wanted to go all out and have some fun with it. Plus I was so anxious to use my new Disney Classics cartridge! This makes me want to take my little Emily to Disneyland for her birthday!
And my favorite quote for 2011
Blue Scholar Blog: The Occupation Movement has been going on for over a month and shows no signs of stopping? Do you anticipate continued growth for Occupy Virginia Beach?
When the test came, it was the elite French Maison du Roi they faced. Later in the day, King George II, who commanded the Army, rode up and said: “So, Sir Andrew, I hear the cuirassiers rode through your regiment today.” “Oh aye, yer Majestee,” was the reply, “but they dinna get oot again.” Such courage could only be expected from men who knew and trusted each other.
On Easter Sunday after lunch, I got into watching You Again while dad & Tbug went out to ride horses. Then Hubby got up and walked outside himself. Toward the end of the movie Hubs calls me and says, You should bring your camera and come out there.
Name yourself after the infamous quartet that held on to Chinese power only to be brought down after Mao’s death and you might get labelled. Create a new sound full of jagged guitars and disco squawking, you might get labelled. Be totally awesome and you will get my vote as one of the most vital bands of the last thirty years.
this was a fleeting moment shared with you.
Picture this: You are looking at a photograph on an iPhone screen. It is a picture with dark lighting, three young teens (around 14) in a bed, squished together, the one in the middle has a blanket up to their neck smiling at the camera.
During a child’s early years of development (1 to 7 years old), they learn many things.
I'm just saying.
Jeffrey looked over. "Yeah."
so. when i freak out, i have two options:
Episode 2 - Perhaps my favourite of the three, I'll just come out and say it - Duncan, I heart you! Seeing Connor's hapless old mate from the ancient days of series one really highlights the changes in Connor. I love the thought that through series 2, 3 and interim gap, Duncan was out on the streets, imagining he was fighting the good fight, when really he just had no clue! Poor Duncan, he's a bit of a bumbler, but a very sweet one. Another plus point, the flushing of a cute little lizard down the loo, aaand... Five years later, flipping great scary dinosaur! Incidentally, at the start of the episode, did anyone TOTALLY think it was Jenny? Cause I did, and it took quite a lot of squinting for me to realise it wasn't. Which was disappointing, I miss Jenny and her efficiency! And after seeing a rather power-neutered Lester, it was nice to see him stand up and take charge again.
After a while, you gotta stop and ask yourself: how many times will this be funny?
Eve Duncan is a forensic sculptor who works to bring closure to families of missing children. Her work touches a cord of heartache for her because Eve's own daughter was kidnapped years earlier and has never been found. In Chasing the Night, Eve helps a CIA agent try to find her kidnapped son Luke by discovering what Luke might look like today. That brief description does not sound particularly suspenseful, but trust me, there is plenty of intensity in this book. The man who has a hold on the CIA agent is pure evil. And scary.
The reason for Christ's wilderness was to give you and me life. In Him going through the wilderness, He taught us how to go through and I get that my reason for my wilderness is to be more like Christ. It is only during my crawl in the wilderness that I see His character more. So I tell myself "Hold on girl." "Wait." "Be still." "Do what the wise ones do."
We will all be doing this visualization at the same time, the moment of full moon, which comes this May 5th/6th. Exact times for different time zones are:
her. But most of all, I’d give her an enormous hug. She was always the best
“If you think Lulu see all their authors in the same light; think again. This is akin to DellArte Press authors (Harlequin’s self-publishing service) thinking they are operating in the same field of publishing dreams as all of Harlequin’s traditionally contracted authors. The Lulu VIP program offers everything to try and lure an established author to the lulu brand, every turn of the drive shaft and spark from the Lulu engine—pre-production and post-publication—is being directed towards the sale of the author’s book. It is notable that the press release to go with the book was not released by Wideman, but Lulu themselves. While Lulu right now needs Wideman more than he needs them, there is no doubt in my mind; the experimental nature of Wideman’s Briefs made it a difficult sell to Houghton Mifflin, and as the author freely points out, he is no writer of literary blockbusters."
- Ex. Yourname_titleofwork.jpeg
The thing about the blog is that even I couldn’t help noticing it was telling a different story than I was. The pictures were so pretty – the food so tasty – how could it all be the product of someone who hated to cook? The blog gave me a different way to see something I didn’t know needed to be reframed.
“Saved my life more than once. Meg?”
remonstration but Beldam simply smiled,
Positive: Psychological neutrality.
Those glass canisters with stainless steel lids? I saw *almost* the same ones at Walmart for $20. EACH! At the dollar store, they were $1.25! ONE DOLLAR AND TWENTY FIVE CENTS! Yes please! Hallelujah!
rather than wandering and roaming freely and spontaneously?
All “Divine” kingdoms throughout the Bible, which rule OVER the earth, are located in heaven. Even the human kings of Israel, were representatives of God’s throne in heaven, ruling with HIS authority, not their own. (2 Chron. 9:8) Israel was the domain of God’s kingdom. God’s kingdom is in heaven with Him.
There is a Body Wash to be used in conjunction with the Moisturiser and I'm going to start using this. If you suffer from itchy skin then I do recommend these products. I think quite often finding a product that stops the itching depends on you - sometimes E45 works and sometimes Dove Dry Skin cream works but nothing was helping this year. The Skin Restoring Moisturiser is £19.99 and available from Boots - not cheap but you get a 295ml pump bottle for that so it lasts quite a long time and frankly you can't put a price on the feeling of relief. I can't wait to start using the body wash (which is £15.99) xx
II) The Lupercalia was a mid-February Roman fertility festival. Which of these was NOT a feature?
Reflexology
keep me safe for eternal life.
Oh, and as far as I know, his Spanish language skills were zero.
Father of the Chapel
as
few days ago, while cleaning the bathroom, i bumped into the door, clumsily. we are going through some rough roads. the idealistic part of me thinks that this is just a phase that we would get through. but in reality, we are through.
Q: Why is my name in the book?
Yeah, he had me until that last paragraph. It would have been interesting to see if he might have changed his mind, had he lived past thirty.^
Level 19: MP Cost: 12, Duration: 190 seconds.
Gee ma- do I haveta?
I'm sorry my friends.
A concerted attack on femininity is underway. All of us who cherish family, morality, and all which the internationalists seek to eradicate, are duty-bound to expose the corruption of our children, especially girls, and to do all in our power to push back the influence of the enemy. We may not be able to stop the filth getting on television etc, but we can stop it getting into our homes. Vermin like the EDL will always exist, but we can highlight their hypocrisy and distance ourselves from their odious internationalist propaganda.
Zorro, Isabel Allende
Daily leave 1 comment on each…
Dear BabyCakes,
In relation to bowel movement, Dulcolax® (Bisacodyl) has been providing relief to sufferers of constipation in many countries for over 50 years. It offers a wide range of products that cater to the different needs of people suffering from this ailment. More importantly, Dulcolax® (Bisacodyl) offers gentle and effective relief from constipation. Dulcolax® (Bisacodyl) is available at all drugstores nationwide. If symptom persist consult your doctor.
Great memories, huh?
You know that moment when you discover you, and probably at least a few of your friends, used to have, or still have, BPD? My moment happened to be on the radio. I’m the wingman on a monthly morning show called Happe Talk on KJFK in Reno. The special guest for the hour on this last show was Dr.
My only criticism of the white chili is that it doesn't include any veggies to speak of, except for the onions, garlic, and small amount of chiles. I'm not sure what would be good in here (that DC would eat), but next time I fix this, I will definitely experiment with adding veggies of some kind to the pot.
I also really like Saskatoon’s statement about Shared Ministry, explicitly stating their intentions and the agreed upon role of professional minister and congregation.
This is one of my favorite posts ever. First posted May 3, 2006. One observation: In 2006 I didn't have a digital camera, which means that most of my early posts had no pictures at all. I don't think I was unique in this. Boy have things changed. I've added the picture that I mentioned below (a picture of a picture, but better than nothing).
I hate these?
“Our attacks against you will continue as long as U.S. support for Israel continues,” bin Laden said. “It is not fair that Americans should live in peace as long as our brothers in Gaza live in the worst conditions.”
Just a few more pale pink stitches and I can start the backstitch.
Be sure to stop back tomorrow and see what else we've got lined up for ya!!
2) Only 1% of death in foreign travel results from Infectious disease
Also, our website has had a COMPLETE makeover. And it also sits pretty at a new URL. The new website is located at:
Chav Harry got up close behind him. Moon could hear his words through his manic yelping.
The Elephant is at the start of a Nietzschean journey, which may turn out better than he thinks. He first meets the Monkey – an avid reader of The Sun. The Monkey asks the Elephant what his thougt for the day is. The Elephant has two: “The cautious seldom err’ and “It does not matter how slowly you go so long as you do not stop’. (Confucius). The Elephant, being a pedant and a grammar nazi, corrects the Monkey’s English… and so the journey begins.
Plain Blue Coats, lappelled, with the Buttons now in Use on the Sleeves aud Pockets.—-Ranks to be
xyz_ : all disks on the enclosure whose name is xyz
It’s obviously been a while since I’ve been in the market for a new job – four years to be exact – and my how things have changed!
On April 16, the convicted killer was denied clemency by a 4-1 vote of the Oklahoma Pardon and Parole Board.
An’ the hypnotic splattered mist was slowly lifting
It is, I believe, customary to start any piece of travel writing by saying that 'xxx is a place of contrasts'. I would hate to go against tradition, especially when it is so appropriate, so:
Later I felt fear of T—-, role-playing my mother, and was able with her help to change the scene, to feel warmed and accepted. I am creating a picture in my mind, of baby Clare (rather than the male name) loved, cared for and blissful. I hope it will have value for me.
Could it really be a year already since the last great Brooklyn Book Festival where I sat among the enchanted and the disenchanted the hopeful and the delusional among the voices of angry metaphors and soothing rhymes among the wandering ticketless rejected superannuated ghosts of a forgotten generation and the fresh faced superbrats of an over rated one-- all of us and my books and my friend Greg getting wet under a pissy but consistent rain selling nothing just mingling with the crazies and the semi crazies all of us inside and out indoors or out with the same thing in common our love of the written word no matter how well or badly written the words are.
Altintop: 1
David G. Carlone, 46, Randolph, N.J.
Wesley reddens and closes the door, while I remove my clothes behind the screen. "Any leering and you'll find yourself deprogrammed for two months and adquatly replaced by a pop-up toaster! I warn Ted.
You may say, “How is being grateful gonna help me?” well I’ll tell ya.
playing and falling more in love with ZJ
Whenever we heard of buying a branded watch, the first thing that comes to our mind is their whooping cost. It is very true that premium brand watches are very costly but the truth is that they are a sign of quality, perfection and style.
Next up was the duffel bag that my parents left me with. I had no idea what was in there, but soon found out that all the clothes were mostly things I had never seen before, and the tags were still attached. Kelly & Joanna dug through my belongings, confiscating things left and right. I just sat there, pretty much in shock that this was happening. In my head though ... I was planning my escape. I was watching every move they made, trying to figure out where my drivers license was being placed, my money, my make up... the things I'd want once I took off.
And some people say that being a housewife is boring…. if only!
So I quickly removed the picture I had hanging there
Yuet Wai and Alvera Kan
It appears to be a trend for Pakatan leaders to condone public jeering, verbal abuse where physical safety of any BN leader is put at stake. Only about 10 days ago where a discourse on women’s issues was held in Penang to which Wanita MCA Penang chief Sdri Tan Cheng Liang was subject to loud taunts from the audience thereby interrupting her presentation, Wanita DAP’s Chong Eng did not rebuke nor appeal to the audience not to be disruptive or rude.
They walked until almost all the light was gone. His hand was like a mold on hers. But she did start wondering where they were going.
It's an indication of the pass we have come to that, I'm ashamed to say, I needed to think about doing on this blog what Hari Kunzru also does in the Guardian today: respond to the conviction of amateur poet Samina Malik for the possession of "records likely to be used for terrorism" by confessing, in the name of freedom of thought, to one's own similar records, research for writing.
Aruba has gotten some time off too. I was waiting for the farrier to come, then it has become a pile of getting after other things that haven't been getting done. Life gets in the way sometimes. It happens to a lot of us. Playing a game of "catch up" makes you think how much you dislike doing ___________ so that's probably why you haven't for a while. But now it is twice the work and you dislike it even more. Talk about a vicious cycle...
I do not want the reader to get the impression that science is without fault and final. Nor am I blind to the inherent flaws in science, namely measuring variables and interpretating the results. In fact I do believe that one can experience the "mystical" and certain subjective forces may not be able to be quantified objetively. This should not invalidate the experience or phenomena.
What. A. Crock.Of. Shit.
5) Read a math book
* the Xmas tree snowflake?
According to the ANC, corrupt journalists receive money to promote the agenda of certain political parties, and the "rot" is far worse than the media would like to admit.
I'm not a lawyer, and in a free country I wouldn't need to be to fully comprehend a law. That said, I am pretty sure this is nothing but a PR stunt designed to give satisfaction to those who envy or think someone making a million dollars needs to be cut to size. They already pay more if they don't have the battery of accountants and lawyers to prevent it.
As we entered the first “room,” on our left was a smoothie bar with an adjoining cyber-cafe complete with tables and chairs to seat at least 25 people. In the “room” itself, was a cornucopia of machines… from ellipticals to various type of exercise machines… pretty much anything I’d ever seen and then some. It was a large room, about the size of a decent sized pole barn with a lofted (2 1/2 story at least) ceiling. From there one could enter a set of locker rooms (separated by gender). The locker rooms themselves were about the size of my high school football locker rooms if you were to have combined the home and visitors sides. Smelled very much like them too… phew! We had the choice to either dress and return to the weightlifting/cardio areas or we could use the pool/sauna areas if we chose (I passed on this, of course).
We are to look in the mirror everyday and know that every dream that is connected to making the world better through our God (Creator and or Universe) given talents some known and others yet to be discovered gets
A: I think this speaks to a lot of problems with how the players got to Williamsport and the developmental path that carries into their teenage years. The main concerns with the 11-12 year olds that are competing in the LLWS is how skilled they are for such a young age. Typically, this means that they have had a tremendous amount of repetition at a young age, and have competed in a very large number of games over the course of the spring and summer to make it to Williamsport.
However, you do need to bring a few supplies and tools to the class, Here is what you need to bring for this class: 1) your favorite adhesive (I would recommend Zip Dry, my new FAVORITE adhesive), 2) scissors, 3) a brown chalk ink pad for aging (but optional), 4) a fingernail file (one of those big black ones you can buy at the Dollar Store, Walmart, Walgreens, etc.), 5) pop-dots or other dimensional adhesive, 6) Crop-A-Dile or other eyelet setting tool, 7) a folding bone will come in handy, and 7) any stamps and inks that you think you might like to use. If you don't have the supplies you need, I know that most of these things can be purchased at one of the onsite stores.
Most of us are just livin' a lie!
Sometimes, I don’t like cleaning
Had a couple nice beer discussions with a some people in attendance. Those in the know were very impressed. Some drunks just drank. The clueless looked confused. Bike geeks seemed to come and then leave..... Hmmmm.
Why it’s good:
Just another dark and empty street
‘$52,300: Political contributions from Exxon CEO Rex Tillerson in the 2012 cycle, alone’.
Irish comic, VegSocUK
Should I know this? Do you other Braves fans know of him?
Knowing she couldn’t do much to stop him, she waited for him to stop talking, continually tapping her fingernails against the table hoping that he’d get the message.
San Tropez
Bingo; 2 simple handprint butterflies.
Halo & wings - Stickles
So i traveled down south this past weekend and i didnt want to return to reality. I had an amazing time with my husband and it was some much needed quality time!
"Named a "Strata Coaster" for it's unprecedented height, first coaster to top 400 feet, tallest and fastest coaster when it opened, hydraulic cable launch system - launches riders from 0-120 mph in less than four seconds."AND...
And how is it possible to ever let go
I found the hair products to really cut down on the itching on my scalp. Therefore, I give it a two thumbs up. I also like the idea of it in a bar. Great for travelling - you wouldn`t have to worry about spillage.
I've been late to the party when it comes to Brodies. I met Lizzie and her mum at London Brewers Showcase last autumn, and had made a note to get along there as soon as I could. No opportunity presented itself until I was invited to go along and help brew one of the festival beers, Noisome Cru.
General Richard A. “Dick” Cody, USA (Ret.)
Think back to when you were a child, did you not desire to fit in? Did you not follow popular trends, for example clothes and music? Even if later you rebelled against conformity, was it not just fashionable to do so amongst your peers, or your group of friends? The truth is, human beings are social animals, we are primates who have evolved over millions of years to hunt and live in groups and thus have developed an inherent desire to conform, as isolation could have proved deadly in the wild.
However much I pray!
* To pray for the folks in the church, this is what I do. Make one page for each day of the week, except Sunday. On each page, list about one-sixth of the names of the people in the church. Put that page in the section for the particular day of the week.
Good morning everyone, hope you're all well today. A quick post from me this morning to show my last sneak peek using the fab Epiphany tool. Leann will be on Create & Craft later today demonstrating how to use it but the full range is available here right now! Once again, the papers are from the Fairyopolis Spring and Summer CD and the image is one of the printable toppers. This time I've used the Epiphany tool with the Vintage settings - Cabana set that has some lovely flower shapes.
I see the lines of rais’d earth stretching from river to bay,
So here's to a fast Fall, surviving harvest, safe travels, new adventures, and living life to the fullest and happiest!
But you know what's worse? The way Handsome Jed likes guilt-ridden, fragile Caitlin way more than he ever liked the confident, headstrong version, and the way Caitlin is so darn grateful to him for it. So while I'm pretty sure we're meant to judge BadCaitlin and think her personality overhaul is a Good Thing, I just can't be a part of that.
1924
Just that day at Nex, I was walking around with Mr Toh when I suddenly felt faint after turning a corner. I had to grab on to him before I fell…. That was scary. Been very worried about this..I may have to go for a body check up soon. *sigh*
It was for me reassuring, during the Cold War, to have someone as well-informed as Laurence Berns (who earned his doctorate in international relations) subject my dissenting opinions about Vietnam to rigorous examination. Similarly, there is much that is reassuring about all six of the essays devoted to my scholarship in this symposium, especially when they are critical, for they suggest that the texts I draw upon are indeed worth taking seriously—that the questions and problems I have posed are worth pondering, whatever may be said of the answers and solutions I happen to offer from time to time. These generous essays may also suggest that the older I get, the better I once was. This bodes well for my reputation in the next century, at least so long as former students of mine with pious inclinations remain active.
The message for those seeking to register trade marks, which may lack distinctiveness, is clear: if an OHIM Board of Appeal upholds the decision to refuse registration and that decision is not to become an insurmountable road block, the only course of action is to appeal the Board of Appeal's decision to the General Court within the requisite time frame (two months from the date of the decision to be appealed).
Patrick has a friend that has been to Maui 6 times and their favorite hotel is Ka’anapali Beach Hotel. It’s described as “the most Hawaiian Hotel” and the rooms are huge but it’s a little dated, has one restaurant and a single pool that’s shaped like a whale, a whale really? That is so cheesy to me. I really am super picky about hotels I stay. Now that’s not saying that I only stay in Ritz Carlton or Four Seasons, in fact I don’t think I’ve ever stayed in one of those hotels. I was blessed enough that my parents could afford to take us on nice vacations and stay in Double Tree and the Embassy Suits but we also stayed a lot in Best Westerns and Holiday Inns when on the road. I just don’t want to stay in a Best Western on our honeymoon. And I am not saying this hotel is in any way shape of form a dump ... just not what I imagined staying at.
R22: Sc 18.
Her name was Kate.
They did have an idea of the words or pictures to be inserted, so that was a great help!
Spanning the years from 1998 through 2011, the book offers a collection of twenty-one essays and speeches. I immediately recognized the first essay, “Pain Won’t Kill You,” which was his 2011 commencement address to Kenyan College graduates. Another one I recognized was “The Greatest Family Ever Storied,” which was originally published in The New York Times in 2010 (and whose title, coincidentally, I spent forever trying to recall about a month ago).
4 people, all friends BUT – there can be only one. *duh duh duuun*
For example, the golden rule. Do unto others as you would want them to do unto you. We are supposed to treat everyone with respect, show our brotherly and sisterly love; but yet there I was, sitting in close proximity to a kid my age, who was saying awful things about people and talking about killing people in war like it was no big deal.
So once again, I find myself in the position of having to raise some other woman's child.
UP TO 42% OFF Remember when your parents taught you to fly a kite? Reenact the nostalgia with HQ Kites & Designs.
I wish I could carry your whole burden,
I think so to a degree, my mother was not a very good cook. I love the company and the conviviality of friends enjoying all getting together and enjoying a meal together. I did grow up as a very wealthy kid but the most wonderful marvelous thing to share was food and then sharing meals together with friends. Food is always synonymous with good drink.
2.- Detonator (aka Trife=Truffles) - Produced by Tonedeff
2nd- $75
So for once, today I was trying to be there for my friend. On time.
When the time came many years later for me to step into a digital camera I put my old manual Ricoh in its battered nylon camera bag and set it on a bookshelf where it sat, untouched, for years.
Things have been getting hairy around Casa Loaf - spring school, sports and extra-curricular activities for the kids, work and personal travel for their parents, races for me and the approaching boating, lawn care and gardening season have all converged on a super highway of busy-ness around here. You likely have your own highway running through the middle of your life.
Located in 859 Sergio Loyola Street (parallel to Morayta Street), La Gota de Leche is very near the University of the East. It almost sticks out like a sore thumb in the University Belt, in Sampaloc to be precise, in an area hemmed in by sidewalk vendors, dilapidated buildings and smelly trash bins. But La Gota stands proud like an old contessa, with its cross-vaulted arcaded loggias, front garden and a non-functional water fountain.
I took several snaps from our hotel bedroom but not one of the sea view, a few hundred metres away. This view, however, shows what an Indian building site looks like.
Thanks to Yvonne at Sketchstitch I am taking part in an international arts and crafts swap and am now on the look out for six people to take part with me and become the next links in the chain.
I loved reading; I read any book I could get my hands on. My third grade teacher made my whole class learn how to read in the cafeteria when everyone was being loud, so we could learn to focus. I probably didn't need a lot of help in blocking things out when getting sucked into another world, and it sure didn't serve me well in fourth grade, when my next teacher was constantly trying to get my attention before class started. One time, I was so sucked into a book that it wasn't until my fourth grade teacher was like, "LAURA!" that I looked up and realized everyone was standing up for the pledge of allegiance.
8. It's Real
I can't be bothered to try and get a response through tripadvisor's filters that I feel would do the Inn justice. With no chef and a busy bar, I've got enough on my hands. Hence the lack of decent blog posts!
This review sounds like I did not enjoy the book. I enjoyed it but also found it frustrating at the same time.
An Overview of Pipeline Products for Burns 9
Author Caitlyn Hunter: “Let’s see, what do I do when I finish a book? Nothing really except maybe go outside and do a Snoopy dance with Des and Fletch… Well, more Des than Fletch since Fletch is a lazy hound dog and doesn’t do much of anything except sleep and eat. Added to that, he’s deaf and can’t hear me sing which is probably a good thing. I’m convinced Des prances around just because my atrocious singing voice hurts his ears! As for when I receive a new contract, my husband always takes me out to dinner, but other than that, I don’t do much to celebrate. I’m really quite a boring person, aren’t I?”
ubiquitous in the lockers of G.I.s during World War II. Other pin-ups were
Her name was Ophelia. She was a decorator born in Belfast, Northern Ireland who loved plants, horses, dry white wines, Ralph Lauren and jazz music. She had a pale complexion, light brown eyes, high cheekbones and was devoted to Manitoba, a white Eskimo dog.
I want to make it clear to the West and to the German people, which is still being blackmailed because of what Nazism did to the Zionists, or to the Jews. I say that what Israel did to the Palestinian people is many times worse than what Nazism did to the Jews, and there is exaggeration, which has become obsolete, regarding the issue of the Holocaust. We do not deny the facts, but we will not give in to extortion by exaggeration. As for the Zionist holocaust against the Palestinian people, and against the peoples of the Arab and Islamic nation – this is a holocaust that is being perpetrated in broad daylight, with the coverage of the media of globalization. Nobody can deny it or claim that it is being exaggerated.
He was a former pilot from the Israeli army, with blue eyes. I met him at a coffee shop on Bleecker Street. It was a Craigslist thing. Not romance. Not initially. He needed an editor for his Yale dissertation; the shifting borders between criminal justice and the Internet. But the sex was inevitable. He was six two. I was blond. I don't think we liked each other very much, but that wasn't important.
BTW, I now think the TK is hilarious. LOLLLLLLL, I'm sure I shall be the next entry!
In any case, my sneakers and all my gear is packed up, I’m eating protein and carbs this morning, and only a few hours stand between me and the race site.
Tall candleholders: Godinger, Goodwill
£7,937
I wanted to write a book that was exciting and action-packed from the get-go, and didn’t let up until the very end. Yet at the same time I wanted to have characters that seemed believable and interesting. I have read other “action-packed” books where the characters were just a flimsy excuse to move the action from one scene to the next, and I didn’t want to write that kind of book, because I want the reader to care about the characters.
It comes down to this, she doesn’t know or care about what it took to get her here, she owes us nothing, and neither should she. The weight of what went before is for us to carry, not her.
You are resting with God
Prism has a purple glitter base that has a slight blue shift. The colour shift isn't as dominant in Prism as it is in the others. Of course, this too is packed with the same multi coloured glitter the other have.
Also ... don't worry, I had scissors by the bed in case we had to cut our way out of a burning house in the middle of the night!
2 Corinthians 2:15
About eight in 10 unemployed have not completed secondary education or just made it through high school. Only six percent of South Africa's jobless have a university degree, a study from the South African Institute for Race Relations said.
Beef or sheep liver is considered a delicacy in Egypt.
With the left over dough I cut out the star cookies.
I am sorry I did not come back and update. To be honest we were so with the way the appt went. I TRY very hard to be patient. I know we are not the only patient they have BUT I think I came the closest I have come to exploding . It was not pretty and I still find myself really upset about it.
4) Drain currants. Whisk remaining 4 tablespoons oil into vinegar mixture. Just before serving, combine broccoli, currants, feta, and half of almonds in a large bowl. Drizzle with vinaigrette and toss gently to combine. Taste and season with a pinch more salt if necessary. Transfer to a serving platter and sprinkle with remaining almonds and the cilantro, if using. The salad is best served at room temperature. Yield: 4 to 6 servings.
Tanstaafl, I don’t know where you got it in your mind that Jews are the most favorably treated of all. People are pretty much given a pass for their anti-Semitism if they’re not white Christians.
This film gets sappy, but it was fine with me. I liked the art teacher angle, as I can relate having a strong art background of my own. Films about art often make me want to pick up my own supplies and work out something myself, and I like the message that art can be an equal ground and a way for people with different ways of communicating to put themselves out there.
3. Party membership stands at around 8,000.
Hugs and "Bunny Kisses," and an emotionally "exhausticated" Bus on the Cheek!
Note that this is the same Quds force that likely trained Iraqi terrorists in the use of IEDs and is suspected of being involved with the recent attack on the Saudi ambassador on American soil.
You can’t seem to sleep more than 20 mins during the day, taking 5-10 mins catnaps and then crying. It doesn’t help we are next to the darned expressway where vehicles zooms past every milli-second.
CARAMELIZED ONION FLATBREAD
Supra Pop Impressions was released in 1973 on Montparnasse 2000, as catalog # MP 16. Montparnasse 2000 was a French label founded by André Farry, with the assistance of Louis Delacour. Delacour would later go on to found his own label, Neuilly. Their early releases, such as this one, were limited to 1000 copies. The label would present 500 copies to TV stations and radios, with 500 reserved for later distribution. Many of my favorite library music albums were released on the Montparnasse 2000 label, so you can expect to see several more MP 2000 releases here on DM in the not-so-distant future.
This has never happened to me before in my entire life. I have never loved someone so quickly, so purely, and so much. The most wonderful part of it all is that I loved you from the start and had, and still have, no idea why. I just do. It’s just there. I have this overwhelming sense of joy when I see you, always. I want to make you happy, and it makes me happy to see you happy. It has been this strong this entire time. Not once have I lost sight of how I feel for you. It has not diminished, or come and gone. It’s a constant. Sometimes I wonder why, but I don’t need to know the reasons why. I just love you, and that is enough for me.
- Certain people seem to heal from deadly injuries.
But if the book is for sale there and we discovered that, then the Publisher needs to do a couple of things. 1) Take the edition down and 2) let us know how many copies were sold and how they plan to account for them.
I have used some gorgeous MME Lost & Found Papers in "Blush"...matted on some brown card and glued down using some Pinflair Photo glue...I fine this easier to use then double sided tape because you can slide the card into place...and no more wonky lines..lol...!
Not seen,
Trap? That’s how that sentence usually finished in the films. The Doctor was a dancing ghost, fading and convulsing, yelling and slapping. Then he was gone.
I wondered if you really cared,
He was our son’s first dog, and he was with the Missus long before I was. It was he who braved the whacky Oregonian weather with my wife-to-be prior to her meeting me. I fondly remember the first time I went to her apartment; he peed on my shoes. Seemed to be a recurring theme with him.
His special adviser resigned on Wednesday, when Mr Hunt made his statement in the Commons. Mr Hunt said that he had no idea about what had been going on, really? PersonallyI do not believe this, but time will tell whether or not he will keep his job.
As fast as I pick it, it doubles in size.
When I talked to the very nice HR lady about these two scenarios her reply was that "We will pay the same for your family's insurance that we would pay for any of our employees. You are the one's raising Goldie, that money should go to you." You could have knocked me over with a feather. My husband drive too far to work hours that are too long, so it warmed my heart to know that he works for a company that is honest and caring.
George was five years old when the family left this area in 1912, driven out under threat from Pancho Villa’s rebel troops during the turmoil of the Mexican Revolution.
I'll begin with my lace project.
That way our showpiece to the nation can return to its great status amongst our society, as oppose to the disappointment it currently is.
You can create the life that you want, one action at a time.
What I am proposing is that the Bilderbergers order the governments they own to use Tesla’s generating technology to replace nuclear power plants first on fault lines and everywhere else later on. The alternative is that America has 15, 17 or even 27 nuclear meltdowns with vast area being designated No Go Zones. Food would be an issue as most rain water would be radioactive. The billionaires would flee the country. The rich would only eat food grown in greenhouses. The poor would riot and demand radiation free food and water. American society would collapse as tens of millions die from cancer, cardiovascular conditions and other radiation induced conditions. Eventually, all nuclear plants would melt down as the number of power plant workers dwindles below the number sufficient to maintain them. This radiation will spread first throughout the northern hemisphere at first but will spread to the southern hemisphere.
-Listening to "Chuck" every time Flynn Rider opens his mouth.
To choose potato chips over tortilla chips and cantaloupe over honeydew.
Unsurprisingly this has provoked mass outrage and whining from the tabloids, and prompted some athletes like Paula Radcliffe to come out and slam the ruling.
Rayanne came back in with a big smile on her face. “It’s set,” she said. “We’re meeting them at Vino bar around the corner from the Barrio on Saturday night, so we can still do our comedy sets and go on our double date.”
I've been wanting to get photo canvas's made of each of the kiddies for awhile now. After pricing it all out, I determined it would end up costing between $200-$250 to get five canvas's made. Now, I love my kiddos and I love nothing more than to see their big, grinning mugs plastered all over the house, but I don't love 'em that much...just kidding I do. But, $250 just wasn't gonna happen.
Santorum: the little fetuses had to
"Vienna, 1939. Professor Speckstein's dog has been brutally killed, the latest victim in a string of unsolved murders. Speckstein wants answers-but these are uncharitable times, and one must be careful where one probes. When an unexpected house call leads Dr. Beer to Speckstein's apartment, he finds himself in the bedroom of Zuzka, the professor's niece. Wide-eyed, flirtatious, and not detectably ill, Zuzka leads the young doctor to her window and opens up a view of their apartment block that Beer has never known. Across the shared courtyard, there is nine-year-old Anneliese, the lonely daughter of an alcoholic. Five windows to the left lives a secretive mime who comes home late at night and keeps something-or someone-precious hidden from view. From the garret drifts the mournful sound of a trumpet player, and a basement door swings closed behind the building's inscrutable janitor..."
So, I now have a "blog button"...if anyone would like to copy it to their blog, with a backlink back to my blog, feel free and I would be more than glad to return the favour. I love the idea of networking and linking up with others who share similar passions. To me it is all about learning and sharing and growing...and above all ~ having fun.
You can always build a portfolio from a 3-ring binder and clear page protectors, just take into account the features I discussed today.
We know we have subsidized nuclear power in several ways also, including costs of emissions.
it’s Ronnie from Art & Design”
“It’s always exciting,” Grimm said. “It’s easy to be optimistic in the spring.”
Hands on gallery
And so, we saved each other, if you can call it saving when it takes the form of body glitter and cast albums and singing "Hot Lunch" in the back of a public bus.
I like how they used different cake stands to showcase different sweets. I like the idea of having cake balls but not sure if they'll be necessary. If they are, I think I prefer them showcased cake pop down (like above) as opposed to sticking in styrofoam. (I officially cannot believe I even have an opinion on that...)
Where I come from, beating up on a woman is never okay:’ Miranda Lambert continues to wage her war against Chris Brown during concert performance – by Laura Schreffler Last updated at 3:36 AM on 18th February 2012
We are living in a sacred moment indeed! The end times are in their final throes! In this regard, our galactic and spiritual families are preparing the path for your move into the 5th dimension, as reuniting a partitioned Earth is the dream of both Heaven and Gaia. For nearly 13 millennia, Gaia has had to embody the dichotomy of a 3-D surface and a 5-D inner world and longs to return to her monopolar, unified Self. This of course necessitates that you, too, swiftly transform into fully conscious Beings. These Beings possess the innate ability to participate in the magical 5-D world of your near future, which is the one we occupy. Our divine goal is to welcome you all to your immortality and the beautiful realm of full consciousness. Every day we send forth our blessings of hope and joy as the time comes to manifest these sacred desires.
